Top Ten Lists Of Top Ten List Lists - by Old School
My Mom is here visiting this weekend! I can't believe how quickly her visits always go. Amelie is already crying that she has to go home tomorrow. Oy. Today I got to sneak out with Mom a bit and we went to see Mirror Mirror.
The “Do What You Want Heaven”
Given all that, you’d think Republicans would be running from anything or anyone who even vaguely reminded Americans of our 43rd president. In fact, the GOP seems eager to get the old gang back together.
Presumably Norsigian has a certain amount of time to comply with the settlement agreement – the website still contains several references to Ansel Adams, is titled the “lost negatives” and contains no obvious disclaimer.
Dissolve the bicarbonate of soda in the coffee. Stir in the vinegar, coffee mixture and brandy to form a dropping consistency.
10. Esther Be The One – 3:30
He took a moment to compose himself, becoming as he did aware of the passage of hours that had passed as he’d pushed deeper into the forest in search for that illusive something that had been gnawing played on his mind since he’d entered the forest and lost himself to its intoxication. He was far from home, much further than he would ordinarily venture on a hunting expedition, dusk beginning to give way to night. No matter. The field he had found himself in was plowed, which meant a village must be nearby. He would go to the local inn and demand shelter. Perhaps a different kind of sport could yet be had.
I've been scaring people at the gym a little this week.
No matter what you say.
My friend's name is Katherine Mary McKendry but everyone just calls her Kat.
I am becoming unsoulclogged.
If, after having followed me away from the crowd, you noticed that I stopped under the mistletoe and took you in my arms, I don't have to ask - I know what you'd do. You'd feel me kissing you passionately. You'd know that kissing you is all I'd been thinking about all night, ever since I caught your eye across the room.
“Okay. Take it easy, everyone. No pushing. Calm down and move toward the exits.” He delivered these lines as though he had experienced it all before. Rob was a hero in
From what I'm seeing, microbrewing is pretty much a labor of love. I'm not rich by any means, but I probably make more in salary than 95% of the brewmasters of microbreweries. It's all about passion and doing what you care about. Yeah some folks get big like Sierra Nevada and Sam Adams, but most microbreweries will never get bigger than a couple dozen local bars and a couple slots on the shelf in the larger beer stores; and they'll operate like that for DECADES. These entreprenuers are running on nothing but excess beer and raw ambition.
Sounds like it could be fun - only if you're anything like me you'll find it easier to write comedy when you're not trying - and impossible to write it when you are trying. Bugger.
Both of our approaches, weren't necessarily wrong, but we both couldn't appreciate each other's individual relationship to financial security. He was trying to say, let the family enjoy itself and I was trying to say, we will when we get out of debt. The stubborn force meets the immovable object, LOL.
Happy Birthday In Heaven Mom
The ADL has organized to silence and eliminate all critical voices of Israel from academia and the media and has targeted professors , particularly those who are African American, and who are critical of Israel.
Not a skirt or primary color to be found north of the drawbridge these days, I'm afraid.
I am a people person. But who wouldn't be, with a "people" like this in the family?
(Of the superior shopper)
Working with noted producer Bill Laswell, the band licensed their first album 'God Bless Satan' to Moon Ska Records and the LP was a hit for the label in 1995 (granted catalog number 666!). It also marked the first time the label received complaints from the religious right and that it had a band with a video on MTV. Mephiskapheles would go on to release two more albums 'Maximum Perversion' in 1997 (also licensed to Moon Ska) and 'Might-ay White-ay" in 1999. I had the chance to re-connect with the band's original guitarist and co-founder Brendog Tween recently and he took a walk down memory lane with me about his days in the service of his satanic majesty. Read on...
The highlights included the following:
12 - Buddy Jones - I'll Get Mine Bye And Bye No. 2 - 3:03
There are two kinds of base glass in this set, Unique Adamantium 511874-1 and Smurfy which is a fabulous turquoise. The larger rounds are 874-1 with silver foil and Z092 turquoise frit. As you may remember from my first CiM/Zim post, I am a little bit of a smitten kitten with Adamantium glass and how it reacts with silver and this unique pull of this glass is no exception. Zimmermann Z092 opaque turquoise frit is a very similar but more saturated shade and tone to Smurfy and I have teamed them up together to make subtle fritty spacers.
We all know what Michael Bay thinks leading ladies should look like. He’s interested in creating extreme worlds filled with only the most beautiful people.
What made Barry change his mind, and what does this mean for self-publishing?
10) Close the fridge.
More times then she can count.
23: 2:35-2:40
Molly O'Neill's One Big Table was everything I hoped it would be- over the holidays, I spent many many happy hours reading this book, and here are 10 things I loved about this book.
hand running
I bought this one because I follow Nicola's blog, and she seemed so excited about this book's publication, I wanted to see what it was all about. It's a YA novel. Sadly I am not a YA, and therefore am not its intended audience. Also I now realised that I didn't actually realise what a YA novel really is. I suppose I thought it meant roughly the same as a crossover novel, ie one meant for kids but which also appeals to adults, like the Harry Potter series. But no, Wasted is an entirely different thing. It's aimed, I would say, at older teenagers. Fifteen and upwards. I think I'd have loved it when I was seventeen.
Like I said she really is a pretty Tilda & looks great in these vibrant reds & greens. I've stamped a Fancy Pants border stamp aroud the corners & edges of the image & other papers in Walnut Satin Distress Ink to add to the shabby look...
My daughter has started to make some beads of her own a few days ago and now each time I am at the torch, she comes around and asks how long I will work, because she wants to make beads herself.
8.killera
I drove a fair distance on the way down because Hanno had a sore knee. When his knee was better, he took over the driving and I was well content because I'd brought along my knitting and something to read. That is always a smart move - take some form of entertainment or craft with you so on those long drives and during the evenings in the hotel, you'll have something to do.
I don't have a huge yarn stash, but I certainly do have one. Over the years, one acquires yarn to precious to use up or trade away. Because I have moved 3 times in as many years, I have de-stashed quite a bit, but still... The natural dyed silk (much of it 50/2) was custom dyed for me by Cheryl Kolander in the mid-80's. I have been carrying it around knowing that I would weave something with it some year. This will be the year!
This system worked for the most part, and then we found out we were moving, and I had to rethink alot when it came to getting the house ready. So, some changes happened. Here's what we have now:
Knowing your vision of success is a journey in self discovery. Some of us know it right off and perhaps have known it our whole lives. I know a 6-year-old who proudly declares that he IS a paleontologist and to back it up he knows, studies and learns everything he can about dinosaurs.
Following the appearance of My Neighbours Are Hoors in the Scottish Sun a week or so back, I had the following conversation with a friend through in one of the other offices:
I came across this one over at Two Peas and their Pod (click the link for the full recipe and directions, rather than relying on my messy printing in the picture). I have to say I love this recipe! I've been making sugar cookies since I was a kid, but since I grew up I've disliked the rolling, cutting, and decorating parts of the job. I'd rather have them ready to eat straight from the oven. I think for me, these cookies are the spring counterpart to my sister's delicious and chewy gingersnaps.
This is the gigantic Sunflower that was only supposed to get to about 18 inches high. I'm not sure what happened, but the leaves and flower are just huge. It's probably about 3 feet tall, but I don't think I've ever seen such big leaves or flowers on such a small plant. The birds will be feasting on it.
7. Favorite color and number?
Pielke has also told the IPCC that citing one section of Muir-Wood’s paper in preference to the rest of his work, and all the other peer-reviewed literature, was wrong. He said: “All the literature published before and since the IPCC report shows that rising disaster losses can be explained entirely by social change. People have looked hard for evidence that global warming plays a part but can’t find it. Muir-Wood’s study actually confirmed that.”
It’s not like the CBO isn’t aware that it is being played like a fiddle. They can only analyze legislation as it is presented – and this legislation is being presented by partisan Democrat ideologues. The CBO has pointed out that the Democrats have a pattern of double-counting the same dollars. But they can’t do anything about it: if the Democrats tell them to double-count, they dutifully double-count. Paul Ryan points out that Medicare cuts are double counted, Social Security taxes get double counted, increased CLASS Act premiums get double counted, to the tune of hundreds of billions of dollars. Other sources of revenue – such as the not-to-be-implemented “Cadillac Tax” which would itself count for 25% of deficit reduction in the CBO score – will likely NEVER see the light of day. The CBO numbers become a shell game.
It's very easy, during those first few months (or years!) home with an adopted child, to allow everything to build up, blaming the child for a lack of bonding and attachment. I admit it. It's even expected when one is dealing with a child who has moderate to major attachment issues. But that doesn't make it right. We are to strive to keep no record of wrongs, forgiving again and again. And again. We will never fully attach to our children if we continue to focus on the wrongs they've committed... wrongs that, when seen through the lens of adoption trauma, are completely understandable. They didn't ask for any of this... WE did. They are children... WE are adults. They lost as much, if not more, than they gained... WE lost nothing.
There are many things that go through a child’s mind at the moment where they are being violated for the first or the fiftieth time. Should they tell? Who would they tell? He or she (the perpetrator) is loved by the family. Do they know? How could they not? How do I make this stop? I don’t want to do this anymore. Help!
Let me share with you a card I made last week using the Parisan Anthology paper again. Love love this paper so much!
4. The ADA's fundraising practices are among the worst in the charity industry. They use telemarketers who pocket one out of every five dollars raised. The Charity Navigator web site awards them one star out of a possible five. (View their rating HERE.)
I made this birthday card for one of the girls at Urban (Roxanne) last week and this time I remembered to take a photo. My new favorite Memory Box die (until the new ones come in) is their twig and leaf die and I used it to make the wreath on the card. The twigs, leaves and berries are not attached when you cut out the die, so you can use any part of the die.
Somewhere in there I graduated from college, got my first job, got my much better second job and then got my bestest third job. Then I got divorced. I dated some losers before finding the love of my life...and then we had a kid.
“But mom, I love biscuits.”
At home with just dry ingredients:
Check back here on Life Full Circle leading up to the show Wednesday night as this story develops. We are working to secure an attorney and members of the law enforcement community as our guests. Stay Tuned.
John Barrowman (my true love) on Nevermind The Buzzcocks (a music/trivia talk show). Start the vid at about 6:35 and watch from there to the end, pay attention to John (he's on the far right in the black shirt) and listen for the Sound of Music. You will like this one, I think. I found it hilarious! This is my personal fave out of all these vids. Actually that's a lie, but it really was THAT funny.
First person narratives therefore can be ‘unreliable’ (a potential plot device) and can also be a powerful tool for getting a person to sympathise with your main character. Reaction is the key.
When I was younger and didn't have any money, I used to use EPT on a regular basis, since I could not pay the blood test (which are more effective). I knew the system by heart. So when I came with my test on Tuesday, I just opened the box, took the test thing out and went on my way.
True. It's a little shattering when you realize that your parents aren't perfect.
-We do not want to take a child away from an infertile family
Lest there be any doubt, the reason that this site remains undeveloped is because of the council (both the current administration, and the previous Labour administration) allying themselves to the doomed Arena project.
The Emmaus story provides a hopeful image—that we are not alone in our pain and confusion. The image is of God walking alongside human confusion, pain and loss of faith and hope. Emmaus invites us to expect God to seek us out in these places. But Jesus may come in a way that is unrecognizable. He may come as a stranger along an ordinary road, the road each of us is on every day.
Mrs. Thwett ate a light supper with them. Afterward they went out on the terrace, where she unfolded the business matters with which she had been entrusted. There were papers for William to sign. "And these will have to be notarized. I suppose there is such a thing down here?"
1. Dandelion River Run
I wish with all my heart that I could take this for face value. That I could say, OK, she has this problem, it will be fixed, it's inevitable with a child with Cerebral Palsy (kinda like the hip thing.) But I can't. Because I asked him if that was the case and he said no. He sees a lot of children with CP or brain injuries and they don't have this. He does see it a lot with kids with spinal injuries (or SB) and they do have this problem....it's common in those kiddos. But not usually with brain injuries.
Item! - Did you hear that TWO Picassos were stolen? Gee, I don’t know what to say about that. I hope they get them back.
Even if there are individuals who want to do it for the sake of having their name mentioned, fine! We will take that money too! However, even the cocky and very prideful individuals are in shortage. The United States Government will not and cannot do everything for the common man. Neighbors, loved ones and churches are to name a few really needs to look within and see what can be done better.
You may purchase a paperback copy of the book at the below links, using the code 6KFVUBN2 for your 14% discount.
Does your organization have minimum acceptable standards…for your salespeople and Managers??
I must say I was thrilled when Meredith of Yours, Mine, & Ours (like how I tied her blog in my title?... I'm clever like that) suggested we do a little bloggy switcheroo today (we're at her blog today too!). We figured out that we have the same shirt, so here we are styling it in our own ways! I bought mine on clearance at Target, while she thrifted hers:
Kegged: 04-29-2008
When my parents decided to divorce, we, as a family, were suddenly and forcefully broken.
I am running again. And mountain biking. And swimming. I’m feeling stronger every day and am working to get myself physically strong again.
1965 – Adrian Pasdar (Actor: Secondhand Lions, The Big Day, Desert Son, A Brother’s Kiss, Wounded, Ties to Rachel, Carlito’s Way, Grey Knight, Just Like a Woman, Torn Apart, others)
11 And he settled his countenance stedfastly, until he was ashamed: and the man of God wept.
“You’re not? Oh, that is too funny. I just assumed. Oh, hold on,” she said.
It is looking for an answer to a question based on our notion of right or wrong. A common approach is for one to pursue self-interest but rationalise it as businessmen do who want freedom to make more money while those at the bottom call for equality. Philosophers disallow this and say there is a moral question. Free-willed acts are a certain sort of moral choice with a moral base. But is it a moral base? If we are determined it is because you are made that way like a dog choosing a bone.
I will make with them an everlasting covenant, that I will not turn away from doing good to them. And I will put the fear of me in their hearts, that they may not turn from me. (Jeremiah 32:40)
Touched beyond words.
Arthur T. Barry, 35, New York, N.Y.
Those of us who have signed this letter wish to point out sharply that new or amended rules with regard to the accepted classical precepts of riding, which are contained in the guidelines written down in your Handbook, are absolutely superfluous and therefore unnecessary. These precepts, which the FEI has up until now felt obliged to uphold, are already fully developed, tried and tested! They are already recognized world-wide as authoritative, and as fair to the horse. Based on centuries of experience, they offer a stable and secure foundation even for today’s riding.
Each of these beautiful women brought a bead which, woven together, formed the most treasured necklace, to wear for strength during birth. Beautiful beads came from far and wide- a surprise package even arrived from my dear online friends overseas.
I am head (and only) descaler at my house. This means that my housemate religiously uses the filter jug to fill the kettle and I do not. You can use the heavey duty descalers we talked about earlier this week, but honestly, I always worry about having gotten it all out. Now I descale the kettle with vinegar. Here's how it goes.
Or they might sit down at your table, order two waters and a cheeseburger.
Chrys., Hom, lxviii: The design of this further parable is to shew that their guilt was heinous, and unworthy to be forgiven.
Those that make it into an esteemed institution promote the prestige of their family, says Professor Rizvi. Yet those that don’t often sink into depression or in extreme cases, commit suicide.
So I finally got off of my tush and went through our entire kitchen to take pictures of the insides of each and EVERY cabinet and drawer. Go big or go home I say! So I did!
Be sure to skip on over to the rest of the Design Team's blogs to see their wonderful projects! Thank you so much for visiting me today... you make my heart ultra sparkly. Have a whimsically beautiful day! :o)
“I don’t think any of us can feel confident one way or another….the return to more normal rates of growth is something that is going to be a gradual process over the course of the next two years. There’s plenty of risks, and that might turn out to be too optimistic, that might turn out to be too pessimistic.”
On our way.
This year of homeschooling has been a long interesting journey.
Many in the Lib Dems have talked about the crowded centre ground of British politics and this makes it a more difficult place to be distinctive. But tradition still clearly plays a big part in people’s voting habits. The traditional voter base of the Conservative and Labour Parties are much larger than that of the Liberal Democrats. So how do the Lib Dems increase their traditional voter base?
In May I am going to try to do everything Flylady tells me to! Before those of you in the know say No! No! No! Babysteps, remember! I should say that I have been Flying for two years now. I have gradually acquired habits, so in theory, FlyLady Extreme should be very similar to my normal life. We also spent a long time decluttering, and the clutter we have left is all in the loft or tucked away in cupboards. It’s a lot less daunting than it would have been two years ago!
A-player opportunities rarely come to B-players. The best opportunities come to those who are already doing a great job. And it is typically the little things that separate good from great. A question to be asking is, “What could I do right now to make things quicker, easier, or more pleasant for my customers?”
So when this box wafted its muted sandalwood scent at me, a tidal wave of powerful memories was unleashed and I was transported back at least 30 years to a bright summer's day in the Barley Mow pub garden on Englefield Green in Surrey and my Granddad holding his pint glass to my lips for me to take an illicit sip, which I’m pretty sure is my earliest beer-related memory - but it’s also so much more than that.
Written by Eric Kimmel. Illustrated by Trina Schart Hyman. Ages 4-8.
These words were read by Cameron Wilson, vice president of UofC’s Campus Pro-Life (CPL), at a press conference this morning in front of the school library. Wilson is one of eight CPL members who were notified late last week that they have been charged with non-academic misconduct over their presentation of the Genocide Awareness Project (GAP) on April 8-9.
We are corrupting and disrupting our own well being, and we are diminishing our own local economy’s with global consumerism.
Very cute.
Where the drifts get deeper
away from the blood and the broken headlights.
The Philadelphia Phillies defeated the Atlanta Braves 4-0 this afternoon. After Carlos Ruiz, known in Philadelphia as Chooch, broke his back from trying to carry the Phillies last night, Joe Blanton had none of it and decided to put the Phillies on his back. Blanton pitched his first shutout since 2007 allowing only 3 hits. Blanton, only reaching 88 pitches in his complete game shows how dominate and in the zone he was.
Brennan had little ability to formulate arguments supported by Constitutional precedent, because he hated just about everything the Constitution stands for. But he didn’t care about legal argumentation. (Most of his fellow justices weren’t much better.) What he did have was considerable personal charm. And so he would charm and cajole fence-sitting justices into going along with his jurisprudential outrages.
My pictures don't do the paper justice but they were still fun to do!
Sin, where are your shackles?
Unless they know you well,
Consider: we have established a precedent for intervention with the Libya nonsense, and have witnessed the folly of sitting back and doing nothing like we did in Egypt. At present we have huge garrisons of troops in neighboring Iraq - funneling arms and military advisers across the Syrian border to sponsor an insurgency would be a cakewalk - and so far we have failed to lift so much as a finger to aid them.
In the U.K., there were two damaged transformers that had to be repaired. But no power cuts. The worst thing is what happened in Quebec. In Quebec, the power system went from normal operation to failure in 90 seconds. It affected around 6 million people. The impact was reckoned to be $2 billion Canadian in 1989 prices.
2. LoL is pretty cartoony, charmingly so. You won’t see many torn bodies or genereal mishandling of corpses in a desacratory way. DoW, you are expected, nay, gleefully appreciative of the fact that your many units (HANDLE THEM) are tearing up many others. Grrrrrrrrrrrross! and great, but G(L)ORY.
35 lb Wt - 78' 9.75" - Libor Charfreitag, SMU - '01
(On a side note: I find secular music to be a big, big stumbling block for me, and thus I don't listen to secular music at all with the exception of film scores... so music with swearing in it isn't even an issue for me. But anyway, I don't recommend songs that aren't clean.)
Thank you for dropping by and have a fabulous day. Hugs, Mette
“Day after day of hard manual labor in hot conditions – without sufficient replacement of fluids – could lead to effects on the kidney that are not obvious at first but over time accumulate to the point that it enters into a diseased state,” Brooks told the ICIJ.
Non-Member conference registration rate starting 1 April $665.00
He said my BP was 160/110 and I should probably go to the Emergency Room of the hospital where I delivered.
Beer Style: American DIPA
“The rooms and houses were cheap, so that’s where I stayed,” he smiled.
:: She is starting to mimic me like crazy. Every time I have the slightest cough... "Mommy are you ok? Do you need a drink?" If I mention I'm cold she'll ask if I need a blankie. If I say I'm not feeling good she offers me medicine. And if I get a boo boo... "Oh no mommy! Do you need a hug? Would a buddy make it better? I can get you a buddy." The sweetness kills me.
Next time, when I enter the hospital I'll be saying, "Epidural STAT, please!"
He's trying so hard, and I have to say that he's been great ever since we allowed him to move home six weeks ago. He's working two jobs. He's paying us rent (savings). For that, I am thankful.
My heart entwined into
Think you can write better than the writers on True Blood? Put your money where your mouth is and tell us how you would rewrite the lines in our special Caption This feature!
I have no idea whatsoever whether he is a great, good, medium or crap football manager. In any of those scenarios, his pronunciation of what we signify with “r” is neither here nor there. Making prejudiced comments about it just makes it harder for any user of the non-standard ways of sounding out “r” feel self-conscious and inadequate. A great deal of comments about language are of this order. Hierarchies serve the people at the top of the hierarchy.
This is a hard weekend for me anyway. It was a Sunday, January 9 1999 that my grandmother passed away. There are events surrounding her death that are still very upsetting to me. As you know, if you've been reading my blog at any length, I was very close to my grandmother, and miss her very much.
So when it’s about time to get off the train, there is this huge dude standing in front of me, eyeballing the heck out of me and not ashamed I caught him doing that, and goes on to whisper something to the dude next to him making him turn my way too. Some of the most uncomfortable seconds of my life. I couldn’t wait to run off the train when it finally came to a stop.
1. Idealism
More seep now mummy
According to Ueland, writing can make us feel healthier too. ‘Colds will disappear,’ she assures us, ‘and all the other ailments of discouragement and boredom.’
2. This incarnation of Opal's is going to be probably the only one that does more sales in food than in liquor. They plan to have any other openings be more like casual restaurants rather than a bar.
Fewer than 30% of suicides leave a note. More probably make the effort but find the results inadequate, the futile attempt at describing logically a desperate and illogical act.
It is very easy to make. You simply peel and core the pears leaving the stalks on, immerse them in red wine and cook for hours and hours in a low oven. There is a quick way to do it but they taste better if you do it the long way. It is also best to use a reasonably good red wine; we find a Merlot works well.
I didn’t particularly know this man, but sure didn’t appreciate him coming in telling me this. I knew he worked closely with a particular boat broker and wondered if that broker hadn’t suggested he drop in on me to feel me out. I looked at him very calmly and told him people die all the time in their homes, doesn’t make the value of their home drop by half. I also told him I’d lost my husband – not my mind! At that point he could see I was agitated and left lol!
The Aurora Police Department said it was not involved in the case because laws only cover children ages 10 and older.
I’m not sure which I prefer. A little bit of both would be nice. Ultimately, I hope to work full-time for myself.
I adore pears. Aren't they just beautiful? I think so anyway! Green ones, yellow or red ones. I find myself very attracted to designs with pears in them. A lot of these are Christmas designs ~ which I cannot resist buying! But I like them all. Do you like pears? I hope so...
3. scattered: If things or people scattered, they went off in different directions.
Hops added on 07-19-2008
During our normal “potato bug patrol” today, almost as if on cue, I noticed a new form of leaf damage on one of the plants. Not sure what it is yet, but I’m sure another “save da tapoes” intervention is going to be required soon…
Ad Age: What does this say about the power of social media, and in particular, gamers ability to come together and use it?
So what’s the solution for writers when their fiction aspires to be art? I think for me it’s not worrying about it. People change, cultures change and if we pander to the culture we find ourselves in, then how do we effectively communicate to it in a way that helps brings about that change? Today’s challenge being demonstrating beauty and the frailty of humanity in a way that doesn’t wrap itself up as a two minute pop noodle cash cow.
me: "well, i can do something about my body... as to my mind, that's hard."
When the people believe a lie then the liars can succeed, when they can be made to confuse good with evil and evil with good, it is then that evil can triumph, which I fear it almost has done.
Kevin Drum sums up the liberal view of poor minorities...
Luckily for us, the final 150 pages make up for quite a bit of the lost time we spent in the preceding 350 pages, the tension palpable as Haven learns the extent of Aurelia’s nefarious plans for the hotel’s various guests, and what she must do to protect the unsuspecting victims. Finally our hearts start beating a little faster and that familiar itch begins at our fingertips, encouraging us to flip the pages faster so we can discover if good will conquer evil in this first installment. Those readers who loathe cliffhangers can breathe a sigh of relief when they reach the final page, as Ms. Agresti nicely concludes this first book while still leaving plenty for us to discover in the coming sequels. Overall, Illuminate is a bit of a slow read, making us wade through a lot of information to find the essential core bits we need to take with us as we move forward, but the end gives us what we’ve been searching for all along and leaves us with hope that we might not have to mine so hard for the flecks of gold in book two.
Verifibly, this was envisioned by the developers of Volvo's viva to Mars and Venus; being a vulva with the virility of Mars.
Neil Young - Dead Man - 1996
And please, feel free to add to the list of scam agents you are more than happy to warn others about.
I would like to thank @VillayCescilove for identifying the members of 1D.
To date, I've written 4 short stories and I have 2 more that I really want to get completed. I've learned a few things during this process. For example, I can't write humor. My hat is off to those of you who can.
A scent?
By confronting the dominant ideology of gender with his own inverted view, Tarantino challenges precedents and cultural practices that serve as informal constraints.
The love from your warm embrace is absent from my soul.
The second call came yesterday afternoon.
"I sit there in the editing room saying 'Don't cut that joke! Cut the plot, cut the murder, cut the story, but don't cut the joke.'...It will always be a cheeky show."
Thanks for stopping by today, friends. Have a great Monday!
Pour a small amount of the hot mixture into the eggs and mix well. Then, add the eggs into the pan and mix well. Add vanilla. Bring back up to a simmer again and turn off burner.
(Note: of course you should use your own judgement about what feels acceptable to you. If you feel uncomfortable, bring it up with HR or your boss. My point is, they don't have the same standard of comfort here, and not to get your panties in a twist at the first incident because the intention may not be to harass you.)
One year ago today, my grandmother passed away peacefully. We miss you dearly Grandma.
These are the first ten. And because Daniela at Arcadia is so generous, she's promised me a couple of extra copies that will be winging their way to Tom and Holly.
Under the pressure of being a new manager, it can feel like you don’t have time to coach poor performers or to further develop your best team members. If you want to be a successful manager, you can’t afford not to raise your entire team’s performance.
Close ups are needed ^_^
The goal of the first chapter is just to create a tension cord, tight enough to pull the reader into the second, third, fourth chapters, and so on to the end. You don't give everything away yet. But you create a triggering event that triggers the reason for the rest of the book. You create an engaging place and time for the story you're going to tell--even nonfiction books must do this via their opening anecdotes.
The attack that takes place is drawn out in a horrendously long scene that’s a struggle to sit through. Each time you think it’s over there is another level of depravity to go.
You are getting closer and closer to walking each day and you have almost fully recovered from your black eye of last Saturday! You are a little hesitant to stand alone for more than 5 seconds, and I think once you are more confident you will be zooming around the house!
I've considered being a Teacher. But I really don't know what I'd teach; I'm not passionate enough about English or Social Studies or Math to teach only that every day. With social work, I can teach something different every day, something essential, life skills and things some kids don't get taught at school or at home. I will also be learning myself.
On the pallet of my skin,
But I digress …
Thanks to Andrew McCallum Crawford for showcasing my poem 'The Rest and Be Thankful' on his Wee Fictions blog here. It was one of the first poems I ever had published so even though it's not in my pamphlet it has a special place in my heart!
That is what each and every one of you are to me.
Everyone has a worldview. It is a set of eyeglasses through which we view life. Our view of God, of basic reality, of humankind and other human beings, are all components of our worldview. It colors our view of ethics and morality, of history and politics, every aspect of our lives and thinking.
Hopefully I can quickly put one together this coming Monday!
In a sane world, there would be laws forbidding the contamination of the food chain by pharmaceutical corporations; health care would be focused upon treating illnesses, not masking symptoms with drugs; those responsible for industrial pollution such as the BP atrocity in the Gulf of Mexico would be dealt with in the harshest possible ways (rather than covering-up their crimes, and even as in the case of BP, orchestrating the invasion of Libya to replace BP's lost profits); mental and physical health would be considered as a whole and not used for political purposes; men such as Mr Rose would be helped back to normality rather than condemned to travel further into insanity.
Another sip another dream.
The menu has the basic grill-type foods from breakfast, salads, burgers, tacos, and other specialty items. What made this place stand out from regular places that “add bacon” to their meals, is the option of what type of bacon you want.
What I did know was there was nothing I could do about it. So I just stood there and hoped they would finish soon. I wanted to be out of this room. I was starting to feel very closed in and that is not a feeling I respond well to.
ABOUT SONGSALIVE!Songsalive! is now the largest internationally based non-profit organization dedicated to nurturing, supporting, educating and promoting songwriters and composers worldwide. Celebrating over 10 years in operation, Songsalive! was founded in 1997 by two Australian artists, Gilli Moon and Roxanne Kiely, who saw the need for a support network for songwriters that could reach the 4 corners of the globe and propel songwriters to the 4 corners of the globe. After 10 years, they have done just that! Established with now over 20 chapters around the world, and over 35 chapter coordinators, Songsalive! is run by volunteer songwriters for songwriters. Through our grassroots international efforts, we've put a stamp on what "global community" truly is and it's the type of community that is definitely needed in this ever changing music business where songwriting can be a very isolating experience and career. We provide a "home", a family, for songwriters and composers through our programs, resources, community and support, all focused on the art and business of songwriting. Through Songsalive!, songs and songwriters can be accessed by the whole world and when the hunt is on, Songsalive! is a one-stop song shop! We run our own programs and events for songwriters, and also act as an umbrella, or a link in the chain, for songwriters to know and find out other events, resources and support centers for them, globally. Check out our events and calendar online www.songsalive.orgMore about Songsalive! in Los Angeles www.songsalive.org
And do you know what? It's OK to be a loner, another part of my jigsaw has slotted into place with a satisfying thwack! It makes life so much easier to accept yourself and not struggle against it constantly.
My newest blogging friend, Maratonjenta from Norway, asked me recently which Greek blogs I would recommend, that deal with interior design.
Got my way. See? They're old and a little bumped up, I don't care. So, he being the cabinet guy with his cabinet guy mind decided to make things flow better, he would make all of my top drawer fronts plain so my little fronts with the wooden green thingys could shine. I like how it turned out!
Robin Jones, Project Director, Disability and Business Technical Assistance Center, Great Lakes ADA Center
-Bryan keeping Sheamus grounded.
3) Highly Experienced Faculty team, includes Professors, Patent Agents & IP Practitioners from the US , Europe and India
The Komets beat Wichitaon Monday Night. They won the Presidents’ Cup. The final score was 6 to 3. The victory marks ninth league title in 60 seasons of Komet hockey. It was the first CHL championship for the Fort Wayne Komets since they joined two years ago.
It was silly of me to even think for a moment that it would happen. I know we don't have the cash...and he only recently transferred to his new job and him getting the days off to stay home with the kids so I can go would be super hard to do.
gina tricot pants
Lost Planes
Wow, she certainly leaves mi jam-achin’!
Inside of me Come decorate, Lord
2) Utah Jazz (19-19) @ Chicago Bulls (33-9), Saturday/7 pm
“One who sees inaction in action, and action in inaction, is intelligent among men, and he is in the transcendental position, although engaged in all sorts of activities.” (Bg. 4.18)
The sleigh and the reindeer, came up in a hurry
and wider even yet.
So how does this fit with writing? Because there's always a moment when you hear of another book, usually linked to a bright award winning name, that has a similar subject to yours. Plunge of heart. Despair in the soul. Some definite stamping about and sulking. But just as a landscape can change on each visit, with luck - and careful writing - our own work can have its own life and spirit. Good luck with whatever writerly regions, times and seasons you're visiting just now.
Approximately 3,000,000 books were published in 2011.
He opened the box and pulled out an odd lump of plaster. He started laughing when he finally figured out what it was.
"Oh, we'll never need that.
Think of it this way. If I say, “Draw a red box”, then there are many possible results.
To make matters even worse, a couple of months ago we had the former brewing students dinner and the pub crawl stopped there for a few pints. I met an older gentleman who was sending back his pint as he said it was acetic. Turns out he was a retired brewer of 30 years.
And since we're being honest - I might as well lay it all out there. Lately I've been disconnected from my Jesus! My prayers are less often, my devotions non existent, and my fire for God is luke warm. But I'll get there:) I have the assurance from the Lord that all I need to do is call out to Him - and he will answer me. So while I am reaching out, trying to dig back into my bible and find some interesting books that light my fire again - you'll all be "in the know". I have a sneaky feeling that this "Winter Blues" is less of a coincidence - and more of a little elbow from the Big Guy saying "Hey! Where have you been Kahls!?"
Hello world!
2009 Stonehill Bristle White
— J. R. R. Tolkien
"This anticipated sequel sizzles with equal parts thriller, suspense and romance. A spine tingling story I could not put down." ~C.K.Bryant, author of BOUND
The earthquake jostles him and his gun goes off while his hand is down. The bullet does a double ricochet and actually hits Joey. He goes down – and – he’s only been grazed causing just a small cut on his cheek. Whew!
Acknowledging that he is in the twilight of his life, Pak Samad expressed a desire to see Malaysia become an example of a new country – harmonious, rich, fair, respectful and dominant in a way that her voice will be internationally respected.
1 large egg + 1 large egg yolk, at room temperature
And acknowledging
A Brief Digression: The Period of Dr. Bob’s Youth.
So for future reference for myself and any other frustrated receivers of DHL, their service department at length told me that I could in future leave in advance a signed note on the door with my printed name, signature, the tracking number, and instructions to leave the package there. It would still be at the discretion of the driver, but if it seemed to be a “secure location” (and I think my private, covered porch qualifies) they would leave it in this case. I plan to do this next time I have an order coming through DHL (I’ve tried simple written notes minus tracking number before and not all companies do honor this, and quite frankly… I wasn’t really expecting the package this soon!).
I acquired these two coats the January my father died. It had been only a few days since his death, but when I stopped by the house my mother was briskly packing up his clothes for the Salvation Army and his books for my sister's church rummage sale. She wanted to move, immediately, and so she was being ruthless about what must go.
· The Way of Suffering
And it has fucking opera music to boot! Holy shit it’s a good thing that this was left until the end because nothing would have been able to top it! It is just so goddamn stupid, another league above ‘singing saving the world’ or any bullshit like that. Nothing, nothing I write here will do justice to just how absurd and stupid that goddamn ballet dance is. Bravo writers. Bravo.
Two commissions of the Mexican Senate recently approved long-awaited legislation, which would fundamentally change the way in which soldiers believed to be guilty of violations of common law or even human rights abuses are processed.
Almost done! Sew down the center (from top to bottom) of each heart. Don't stop the sewing machine, just keep feeding the hearts through the machine. One right after the other. I kept my foot on the pedal and let the machine sew a few stitches in between each heart.
“The (ruling ANC’s) umKhonto weSizwe and Azanian People’s Liberation Army-controlled SANDF*, of which we have recently seen the levels of discipline, has about 500,000 automatic weapons at its disposal.
The project currently has the support of numerous Victorian Bunnings Warehouses and the Salesian College at Sunbury in running collection drives and collection depots for donations.
I wore my white shirt, big belt and my high waist pants (I have them since I was 15) and still fits me perfectly *I wonder if I ever grow hummm ...
71. The Ditchflowers-Birds Eye (Sunshine Drenchy)
I remember being so frightened that I was almost crying as I ran through the forest towards the little service road. Why was this moose chasing us? What if it caught us? Would it eat me? Kick me? Throw me up in the air with its antlers? I was gasping for air and sobbing a little and it wasn’t helping that I was wearing clogs. The thicket we were running through had dead branches and soggy puddles all over. They clawed at my feet and suddenly my one clog fell off. I didn’t even stop for it; the moose was gaining on us. I ran in my sock and other shoe. The moose crashed through the branches after us.
of a favourite
After an item is sold, I will remove from this list.
As it turns out, my dentist has never been to America and only knows about American fashion by what she sees on TV. People on TV usually have multi-million dollar wardrobe budgets and professional make up artists. I didn’t bother arguing this with her because she had a drill in my mouth.
Easy peasy. You sack Ralph Bates, re-hire Peter Cushing and go back to the old continuity…
cinema classics
Waist 38" (down 1")
Reading Gross's text is an experience unto itself. He was double trouble as a cartoonist because both his drawings AND his dialogue are priceless. For example, he once transformed the song lyric "sing a song of sixpence" into "seenk a sunk from seex pants."
and I shall be content
Context on the show: Mike Tyson-based Drederick Tatum offers his take on his upcoming fight with Homer.
We have been doing practise tests at home with me reading him the questions. He is doing quite well and is feeling good about it all. With the numeracy tests he is even ENJOYING them and thinks they are fun.
June 3 - James Arness, actor (Marshal Dillon on "Gunsmoke"), 88
H - Rex, next week's post is all set up and ready to go; you just have to press a button. That's all.
Tunic, Free People
6 egg yolks
Rep. Jerry Madden (R-Plano), Chairman, House Corrections Committee; Deborah Fowler, Texas Appleseed; Marc Levin, Texas Public Policy Foundation
6. My favorite writers are Robert E. Howard, Ray Bradbury, Steve Gerber, and Sparkle Hayter
In honor of National Grilled Cheese Day, I poured a beer in honor of my mother. I toasted her, "Prost, Mutti!" and proceeded to mac down on a gloriously gooey and crisp sandwich.
And so I read.
And yes, she picked out her back to school outfit :)
Most commentators, for obvious theological reasons, want to “protect” God, to remove this character from scrutiny, much as God pronounces the tree of the knowledge of good and evil to be off-limits to the humans in the garden. Some readers, however, are willing to pluck the fruit, eager to learn what the knowledge of good and evil is all about. Tensions and contradictions within the text, and between the text and reader, may challenge us to reenter the garden with our eyes opened, even if that eventually means running up against the contradictory, unstable character of God.
powdered sugar 1/2 cup
This month, we've combined this beautiful Flower Basket paper from Pebbles' Fresh Goods collection with TCP's Admit One set and Big Ticket Cutups die (so generously donated by the very sweet Alma!). I had fun pulling ink colors from the paper, and I sponged the edges of the ticket with Antique Linen Distress Ink. The numbers on the side are actually a very important date in my near future (part of that curve ball I mentioned earlier...). Cryptic enough for you? ;)
Watch what will happen, sarcasm aside, if you stop someone mid-argument and ask them “why is slavery wrong, exactly?” They may look at you as if you just confessed to being a mass serial murderer. When it comes to their cherished beliefs about how things are and ought to be, not a shred of evidence is required. Why its just obvious, you see, that slavery is immoral, and anyone who doesn’t agree is just evil. And yet if man is simply an animal, I see no reason why he can’t be yoked like any ox in the fields. Point of irony: the slave of the ancient civilized world (and certainly the “Judeo-Christian” world) had a higher ontological status than the (allegedly) free man of modern Western societies, who is nothing but an evolutionary hiccup in a meaningless universe.
Royal Jelly – Secretion from the throat glands of the honeybee workers that is fed to the larvae in a colony and to all queen larvae. No proven value in cosmetics preparations. Alternatives: aloe vera, comfrey, other plant derivatives.
were taken by
Angie was talking about her office this morning…about a meeting they were having today about the program for which she has responsibility. A new employee worked on a similar program in another state and feels ‘his program’ is much better than the one they’re currently using. He is trying to push his idea which could mean he would also want responsibility for ‘his program’ since he’s familiar with it.
This is an especially powerful offering because it replaces the single moment of instant gratification—buying the perfect camera, TV, or phone—with dozens of such moments. Every time they install an app or download a song, users are getting a customised experience with an emotional impact on par with the one-time purchase of a product.
1 concentrated
I was hoping my surfboard would be a nonchalant and cool styling prop for my super-glam and girly bedroom. You know, like: "Aha! You didn't expect that, did you?? There's more to me than meets the brass/mirrored/velvety/trellis patterned facade you see here!"
Not everything will work out precisely the way you planned. If you are too rigid in your approach to making resolutions, the first minor obstacle can throw you off your course completely..."
But the bottom line is that I feel like a zombie and being whacked over the head with that invisible hammer that my mother uses on me does not help.
The well-written, four-page History of Mars section begins big, with a creation story, the introduction of a supreme Intellect and existential threats to the Aether and Void in the form of the Dark Ones. It moves on quickly through the creation of the telepathic and amphibious Skvani - ocean-dwellers on a still far distant Mars - the attack of the Lalk and the production of the slave race of the Grays. Again, those challenges.
Um, yeah, I think I would definitely like to see pictures of that and all the fantastic things she has at her store!
Show up, maybe even a little early. Order up some awesome yet reasonably priced food and/or beverages (yes, they have beer and wine) on the Tom's side, then head on over to the Snug side and grab a seat at our Big Dinner table. We'll chat and eat for the first hour. Then we'll have some amazing entertainment. This month, that means the brilliance of:
Only 1 comment per person. Extra comments will be deleted. If you want to ask any questions, start some discussion, etc then please use the Guestbook, or email me direct. If you somehow botch your comment and need to delete it, then whilst signed in you should be able to click the trashcan beside it and then start again from scratch. If you can’t, then email me and I should be able to do it for you.
ms cherish punch
His paper eye and mouth inserts have been treated with an archival paper spray to help them last throughout the years.
To optimise logistics for the run on Sunday, I'd turned up with just the running clothes, tee shirt, shorts, nothing to carry. The shorts also only had one of those inside pockets about big enough for a phone or a couple of credit cards. I'd put my car key in it wrapped around with a banknote.
not one person is walking their dog,
The boss-doctor did just that and a very, very, long mass came spilling out of the doggie’s vag.
Halifax – A nice cycle once you get out of the city. Do not forget your lunch, as it is a piece out. Oh yes, watch out for fog. Why they put this airport into a fog hole is truly amazing.
Today the scene has changed completely. The first impression is one of grimness and austerity. The ordinary Frenchman is now dressed in a vile garment known as a canadienne, or shapeless reefer jacket with fur collar, knickerbockers, white German socks and hobnailed boots, with or without leather gaiters buttoned to the knee. So dressed he goes to work, to dine or to the cinema, or strolls along the boulevards looking the women critically up and down.
June 28th, 6-8 pm – Spyder Show Room/Icelantic Ski Gallery, Battery 621, Denver (Suggested Donation) – This event is a fundraiser for Edge of Seven. We will highlight the trek, celebrate our recently completed projects and be available to answer specific questions about our work in Nepal.
As any half-decent magician would be able to tell you, the simplest way to create the illusion of invisibility is to divert people’s attention elsewhere. This phenomenon explains perhaps why the building at n°21 Rue Laffitte is so little known in Paris.
Snacks:
“My name's not Bleek!” She was shouting now, becoming hysterical. “Get away. I'll shoot.”
A--You're adorable
After the war, in 1866 Thomas Ray bought land from his partner and father-in-law, Levi J. Knight, where the Rays constructed a new home and moved their family. This land was 225 acres of lot #424 in the 10th district of Berrien County, on the west side of Beaver Dam Creek right next to the grist mill. Nearby were the homes of his mother- and father-in-law, Levi J. and Ann Knight, and his wife’s cousin Henry H. Knight. To the west of the Ray farm was the property of William Gaskins.
Nine-term president Jejomar Binay finally steps down;
Being knee-deep in the big muddy is bad.
When real tragedies occur, the surviving stars do their best to keep their comments respectful. But when the creepiness stops just short of ending someone's life, Hollywood's PR machine acts like it's hit the jackpot."When we were putting together the press tour for 'Amityville,' Ryan Reynolds and the other stars kept bringing up everything from the real-life deaths that surrounded the shoot to the fact that Ryan kept waking up in the middle of the night around the same time that his character did," said one of the film's publicists. "It's some creepy stuff, but to those of us behind-the-scenes on horror movies, it helps
Since the breakdown of the Soviet Union, the Comecon and the Warsaw Treaty Organisation in 1991, three heads of states, odious to Western governments and institutions such as USA, EU and NATO, were killed by them respectively died under their responsibility. This is remarkable. On the 11th of March 1996 Slobodan Milosevic, former president of Yugoslavia, was left without medical help during his trial in the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia in Den Haag and died in his cell in Scheveningen. On the 30th of December 2006 Saddam Hussein, former prime minister and president of Iraq was hanged in Al-Kadhimiya north-east of Baghdad. On the 20th of October 2011 Muammar al-Gaddafi was lynched in Sirte.
I kind of love my yellow shoes. I have been keeping my eye open for inexpensive yellow items to add to my wardrobe and wear with the pumps. This tee was on the sale rack, so I didn’t feel too bad about buying it.
So, what is happening? Well, the Malay/Muslim community is once again being consolidated and united around Umno. Inevitably, this will have tremendous long-term repercussions for the community and indeed the country.
Stephen Joseph, 39, Franklin Park, N.J.
152 4. “The Limitations of Public Opinion: Thoughts After a Quarter Century as a Non-Lawyer,” Focus/Midwest, vol. 11, pp. 23-24 (March 1977). (Source: Item D-XI/10/1975, below.)
Michael Shannon, Shotgun Stories
The weather was unusually warm in Long Beach last week and as I left my house it was a warm 80 degrees. A half hour later the temperature registered 93 degrees and 45 minutes later at the top of the pass the winds were blowing a cold 42 degrees.
Graceling by Kristin Cashore: This is a favorite book of mine, as it is one of the first YA books I read, loved, and made me interested in seeking out other YA books.
My other big news is that I’ve started Weight Watchers. My mom did it for years and several of my friends are doing it, SIL included. I was finally ready to make a change. I’m so tired of being this size and have many goals I wish to achieve. The main one: my doc told me I have to lose at least 30 pounds to be in a safe weight to have kids. That’s all I needed to hear. I don’t want to be overweight my whole life and I definitely don’t want weight to be on my mind when I have a baby to take care of. So I decided to make changes.
This week at Craftside there is a blanket stitched felted flower pattern and tutorial, a chance to win a copy of The Wine Lover's Devotional, some high fashion clothing details, and a recipe for an oven smoked roast.
“I do not think that the idea of your son being with a stranger for ten days worry you , but the thought of not being needed anymore worries you more, ” told my bald friend. I told him that was not true. He replied with a confident laugh in which he said, ” You must have forgotten that I can see through you. “
Ten years ago, one of the world's most respected gardeners, British-bred Dan Pearson, discovered a neglected city plot and sought to turn it into a thriving garden space. Written as a compelling essay, Home Ground documents that inspiring project, complete with Pearson's successes, failures and gorgeous, full-page photos. Hardover: 272 pages.
Holdovers hanging
We then, slowly and sadly,
And oh, remember, it was a one-night stand.
Beat the butter with an electric beater until creamy. Add the sugar and beat again until light and fluffy. Add the egg yolks, one at a time and beat again.
The good news is, no-one's started world war 3 (unless I slept through that news bulletin) and I seem to be on the mend at last.
speaking of paintings, i'm currently working on several licensing projects that have me going through my entire portfolio. that means i'm looking at every single piece of art i've made in the last five years - hundreds of paintings. as i go back and look at each one, i'm reminded of how far i've come, how each piece represents a moment in time for me, how they tell the story of where i've been these last five years, how i've grown as a person, as an artist. as i see and witness the transformation in my portfolio, i can now really see and witness the transformation of myself these last five years. i hold so much tenderness for that 30 yr old girl (pictured above) who found her passion and never looked back. i'm so proud of her, in awe of her and in some ways, i miss her.
Each person left that church more committed than ever to bring the killing to an end.
The Murphy clan have every reason to reject authority (well, apart from that of church of course, but more about that in a minute) and Truman to an extent has to bend to their will in the hope of being able to communicate with them meaningfully outside of his professional role. On the other hand, this ends up working to the advantage of the plot, albeit through some outrageous coincidences. That is to say, while Truman comes to understand the plight of the disadvantaged Murphy family and of those just like them and opts to try to help, it also turns out that Johnnie is the firebug that he has been looking for all along when at CID. In this case, the Lord really does seem to be moving in mysterious directions – and yes, God, she does make an appearance here, in the shape of the always wonderful Peter Cushing as Father Laidlaw. In many ways he is there to symbolise that sense of social cohesion that the filmmakers are suggestion is sometimes lacking and worth striving for. Johnnie certainly says to the padre that he feels completely disconnected from those around him, even the gang members, and just can’t seem to resolve his own conflict. The Murphy family may resent the police (Cathie never really stops covering up for her brother, even after he is responsible for at least one death), but hasn’t given up on the church – indeed Johnnie almost makes a clean breast of crimes to the priest but Truman inadvertently walks in on them and so sabotages the attempt.
Condolences with the family - who supplied the information since Media 24 and the news services can not be bothered to report on black on white attacks until days after the event.
Mocknick: In reality it is a standard practice.
We see a related trope in The Prestige (2006), Christopher Nolan’s mind-bending film which may or may not involve a machine that makes copies of people, or people who simply learn very skillfully to disguise themselves as one another. Which is it? The film pushes indeterminacy to the limit, as doubles proliferate. Pairs, series, lines, solids of reflections and refractions.
Other: Square Lattice EF, Whisper White Taffeta Ribbon, thin wood craft frame (non SU)
The story has holes, however, and loses momentum. The story skips the entire war though it was interesting to read about the changes to China as the communists took control after the war. The character development also seems flawed. Feng, who appears to mature and grow and overcome her abuse, never seems to see the good in the people around her and reacts with selfishness. Her personal redemption comes so late and I was, frankly, disappointed by the ending.
come to realize, is a prince among ruffler feet as well as a prince among machines. With a certain amount of experimentation I determined the settings I wanted, and, based on a foot-long sample, figured I had the ruffle ratio set to 2:1.
Hence Thabo Mbeki's calling the country's first democratic election in 1994 as "an African Renaissance".
Welcome to this week's Headbanger Challenge. We decided not to bother last week as neither Kathy or Stewart were able to participate for various reasons, and it wouldn't be much of a challenge with 40% of the gang missing. So my theme of 'competition' has been held over until this week.
When I got home, I decided to poll my Facebook friends about Britax and to check out the Britax reviews online. I was pleasantly surprised on both accounts. First, I had some very good Britax reviews from my friends (this means the most to me). Then, the online reviews were great too. And then…the best part of all…I found the Britax stroller and car seat on Amazon for MUCH cheaper! Score! So, it has been decided. We have our stroller and car seat. One step closer to being ready for our little Bun to make his entrance into the world. Now, we just have to figure out how to install the base into the car.
67) My parents both worked full time, and mom had to return to work 6 weeks after I was born, so my Great-Aunt took care of me. I was with her for about twelve hours a day, and she was wonderful. I used to feel guilty because I loved her more than my mom, and when I was a kid, I thought I might go to Hell because I loved her more than my mom. Auntie died a few years ago, and I still miss her terribly.
God seems to give you a fresh breath of air?
You have an excellent Pay-Per-View with excellent matches so far on the card, with one more before your main event. Your crowd is emotionally spent yet hot for the final match, and you must calm them down before giving them the last match of an awesome night.
MPS Stamps Tweetie Hoo Puns
I have had many conversations about parenting in the past eight months since I started this blog. The absolute most frustrating type of conversation goes something like this:
~~Other space marines~~
The five stories we selected are excellent; it was a pleasure to read and reread them during the editing process.
One of the observations I have made since being back in: most of the prior service Lieutenants choose to wear their Army issue boots. Most of the new Lieutenants choose to wear after market boots (which we were never allowed to wear when I was in). I’m not sure if it’s a comfort thing or if it is, as I suspect, a hardened resistance to blowing money on unnecessary Army stuff. I hope it is the latter.
I just keep silent and dont say anything to her.
THIS TOUR ENDS: Monday, October 31, 2011 at Midnight (PST)
Really our home still needs a lot of tweaking.
My question to them is – “Where are you putting this photograph?”
While I was searching the 'net for ideas I came across this color chart that was billed as Fall color trends. I see some I like. I'd rather decorate a room in "moccasin", "khaki" and "scallop shell" with a little "parisian green" than carve a pumpkin!! I'm in love with an already carved and highly glazed painted tin one in a store window downtown but the price is formidable. I may just be happy with the usual mums and the wreath I bought on a whim after I learned the price of the tin pumpkin.
So I'm alternating the cotton Sugar'n Cream Aloe Vera green roses with the slightly yellowish acrylic Threads & Loops Soft Fern green roses (two in each block) with my unknown favorite green yarn for just the center green rose square.
The book is so interesting because it really makes you think about what heaven is and why this little boy had this experience. Everybody has different ideas and opinions about religion but I did find this book reaffirming and coming from a 4 year old it seemed very innocent and real. I would definitely say if you are interested in religion to check this book out, it's such a quick read and I don't think you'll regret it.
Okay, so dude, I went to see Mission Impossible: Ghost Protocol a week or so ago. And not only was it a fast-paced thriller (just what I like to see), but it taught me a thing or two about writing.
Can you free a human being? And actually he didn’t want to do anything…he was forced to do the little that he did. But we honor him with marble…and Thomas Jefferson, slave owner. You know…they tore down the statue of Saddam Hussein in Iraq. Remember? And I’m not saying Hussein was a good dude or shouldn’t have been overtaken. But one fact I know: They tore down Hussein’s statue…and Hussein never owned one human being. Just saying.
Other changes to the Election Offences Act 1954 which could cause a hindrance to election observers are:
You appealed to Daniel 7, particularly verses 13 and 14 and imply that this supports the view that the kingdom is in heaven. While it is true these verses seemingly do depict a heavenly setting, the interpretation given by Daniel in the very same chapter shows it is, in fact, quite terrestrial. From verse 15 on Daniel relates that he was given the “very interpretation of the matters.”
The journey stretched interminably long. Sugar would make everything better, we consoled ourselves, eventually escaping the testosterone tin can and finding sweet solace in the elegant surrounds of Burch & Purchese.
… which shows the links posted in tweets on Twitter in a more readable and informative format. I find it very useful as a kind of digest of the best of the tweets from the people I’m following on Twitter, including my own. My only complaint is that sometimes its idea of what is important doesn’t always concide with mine.
Let's say there's a street fair. It's big. Tens of thousands of people are attending. It stretches on for blocks with artists and food and music and people, people, people.
Prepare the fruit. For the pineapple, remove the peel and cut it into quarters lengthwise; remove the core by cutting along the inside length just around the woody center. Depending on the size of the pineapple, cut the quarters in half or thirds lengthwise. For the papaya, cut it in half lengthwise and then lengthwise again into sizes similar to the pineapple. Prepare the mangos by identifying where the pit is and then cutting the fruit along the long sides of the seed. (There are mango gadgets that do this for you, but if you don’t eat mangos very often then I would suggest just using your knife.) For the raspberries, fill a bowl with cold water and gently place the fruit in the water. Allow them to sit in the water for a few minutes to clean them off and then allow them to dry completely on a paper towel.
Little Man-4 yrs
Anyway, some time later, Se Na asks to meet Yi Gak and tells him that she wants to marry him. What made her decide at that minute it was time to marry, we will never know but I don’t care. I’m just glad the plot is moving along.
Note: entrance to the Roman Villa costs £5.30 for adults & £3.50 for children (at the time of writing), but is free for English Heritage members. For more information go to the English Heritage website.
After all, it’s what Jesus would want.
He looks at his long underwear as he removes them and then he looks at me and asks:
9. I went to bed at 9:30 pm
12 OCS practicals
People are afraid of the horrible truth that Christians mess up and stumble all the time. That’s why you always hear about Pastors being disgraced, but never about them being forgiven. Great men of god stumble and make fools of themselves.
She'll definitely get a board position if she has 15 per cent. Whether that will allow her to dictate the policies of the paper I very much doubt, because it's not enough to control the paper. It's got a tradition of independence. It's got a very antsy staff, basically, and I think that she'll find that 15 per cent doesn't buy her what she's after.
When I woke up this morning, I saw two messages from Amazon in my inbox, each saying I'd received a gift from Katrina. She sent me a couple of songs, and I downloaded and listened to them, still in a sour attitude. They were nice songs, but the fact that she cared meant so much more than the lyrics to the songs.
There may well be ‘one landscape’
His sons and daughters and grandchildren loved him very much. He was looking forward to his birthday party very much, and although 90 he still had all his faculties and liked to have fun. The party got underway, all the family were there eating,drinking,chatting and generally having a good time.
5pm: Special projects!
The Mad Scientist (30) – Complete NATURAL SELECTION
RAS Showgrounds, Sydney, New South Wales, Australia
So here's my week at a glance (click to biggify)
On my way back to my car there was a little grassy park area with some modern artsy looking sculpture--
*Punch pooran is a whole spice mix made up from cumin, fennel, fenugreek, black mustard & onion seeds. It gives a great rounded flavour to any indian dishes & is available from East End Foods.
Capital Autumnal Fire; Middleton, Wisconsin, Doppelbock, 8.5%
Sebastian: *laughes* Dude, he totally takes tips from me.
Prf. Pilsner
And I can't buy into the "two wrongs don't make a right" argument. In other words, just because we approve of slave labor in Sri Lankan textile mills, shouldn't mean that we should approve of fur coats. That train of thought is invalid in my book. With a single sentence it sweeps under the rug all of society's crimes, but feels okay with fixating on a single one.
Peter Davies, elected as Mayor of Doncaster in June 2009.
The power of Love
Darn I got off the subject…lol So this morning I walked to go and get my Gatorade, came back with three heavy ass bags, bout killed me.
I am almost 85 and my wife is not well. Being able to order and pay for everything we have delivered, which is almost everything we buy,the cash back pays the delivery tips, which is a great help to us with so many DR. bills and other necessary items.
WRITING THE REVO BLOG HAS BEEN VERY PAINFUL. IT HAS ALSO MEANT THAT WORK ON MY FICTION HAS COME TO A HALT. I MISS IT. AND I MISS HAVING MY BLOG FOR OTHER RANTS AND CONVERSATIONS.
So fish fry was a regular at their house and another thing was a regular too! A Theeyal! It could be a 'pavakka'/bittergourd theeyal or someother theeyal. If that was there, I wouldn't even need a fish fry because the theeyal was delicious on it's own! I would finish up my rice and curry very soon and lick my fingers and every last bit of the curry left on the plate.Then I would go wash my hands (without soap!) and wait for Prinu to wash her's so that we can go to her room and tie our plaits once again :-) Peramma used to tie our plaits after lunch. I had just shoulder length hair (even now!) and Prinu had a little more longer hair. So,the two things I envied in her then, was the length of her hair and height. I used to stand on my toes to reach her height and I used to bend my head back so that my hair touched my waist! :-)
There are many, many more but I’ve selected these apps to give the students a good toolbox of skills.
Isn’t Thomas saying: “DON’T EVER DO THAT; RAGE-RAGE-RAGE.” But he is not clear what the tools with which to rage are. Peace or Violence – Thomas either doesn’t know or doesn’t make it clear. This is the plight of sensitive poets: all they know is to rage-rage. It may be futile, darkness may be temporarily right, but they do want to keep up the rage.
I could write a novel about the dog community, so I'll sum it up in a phrase commonly said in the dog fancier community. If you make money breeding dogs, you're not doing it right. If you're not interested in spending a large fortune improving a breed, you're better off getting a dog from rescue or the shelter.
(image from Angel Therapy cards by Doreen Virtue)
Now if you want personal training, well there’s going to be yet more fees for that too!
of vomit
Saturday - Hamburgers
Looking around quickly on the forum came to this very recent thread from yesterday with CCP Soundwave chiming in here.
11. Play board games
I chase the woman from behind. It would all end if she turned around. If it ends, it ends. And for that very reason, I pursue her. I chase the woman from behind."
When I tried the top-down version I did not know that fabric lying around relaxing for a while can not be relied on as a guage swatch for yarn that is subsequently ripped, stretched and re-knit. I learned that lesson the hard way too.
In which there is no other meaning, itself
~ Jorgen Elofsson
I realize that more traffic might be generated for a struggling business venture, although they won’t be receiving as much capital for their products and services, depending on the nature of the particular business.
Not all the Japanese people neatly put away cigarettes like he does. But I felt like it was like a pictured delicacy of Japanese people when I saw a series of action my friend took, purposely carrying around a mobile pocket-ashtray and putting cigarettes away. In America that I know, no matter who they are (liberals, conservatives, environmentalists), they all throw cigarettes onto the street without having second thoughts.
“I would say it is unlikely, but then I happen to have met Mr Joyce, so I am treating it as a serious allegation.”
Saturdays at work are crazy busy this time of year. Usually there's someone representing one of our favorite producers tasting wine or ice cream or something delicious, and this week was no exception. Dave's Cape Cod Smokehouse was there this weekend selling EXTREMELY DELICIOUS smoked fish. I was particularly fond of the smoked bluefish (and the bluefish spread, yum) so I brought home a big fillet. The smoky flavor played well against the peppery bite of arugula and earthiness from the lentils, and the pickled shallots are a great high note. Go find yourself some delicious smoked fish and try it!
Three snotty noses,
The design is to be done by Nico Arze who did work on Tertulia, The Box London and Masak. Construction is in the hands of Matt Maddy (No.7 and Weather Up).
Now, with all those great things to make up a great show, why would NBC decide to pull it from air? Well, since NBC’s track record with keeping good shows on the air hasn’t been that great this season (see: Prime Suspect, The Playboy Club, and even though it’s back for now, Community) it really should come to no surprise that NBC pulls shows that don’t get amazing ratings right away. Unfortunately, NBC gave it almost no chance from the beginning. BFF aired on Wednesday nights at 8:30eastern/7:30central against Suburgatory and the juggernaut that is American Idol. According to TV by the Numbers, AI had over 16 million viewers, Suburgatory had over 4 million and BFF had over 2 million. How fair is it for NBC to expect a new show to do well against two shows that already have an established viewership?
Western establishment media organs are tripping over themselves to broadcast tragic footage showing the death of a young Iranian woman allegedly at the hands of pro-Ahmadinejad forces in an effort to rally international opinion against the government of Iran, a stark contrast to their complete and total refusal to broadcast footage of the hundreds of thousands of innocent women and children killed in Afghanistan and Iraq by U.S. and UK troops.
Our desktop (say that slowly with me now, children: “desktop”) computer has been with us many years. The way this machine behaves, you’d think it was a thrift store find, but my husband assures me we bought it retail, at about the time the Russians sold Alaska to the United States of America. I am now typing on newer technology: a laptop that was manufactured circa Alaska gaining statehood (we’re the 49th state, in case you were wondering).
I’m usually not one to shout from the rafters that it’s my birthday. In fact, I don’t think I mentioned my birthday on the blog the past three years. But this year, I had a change of heart. So - it’s my birthday! Let’s celebrate (good times, come on!) (Remember that song? yeah, you’re probably too young.)
Thrifted top and shorts
(Over on my other blog, I'm discussing the renal system, by coincidence. Well, I say 'discussing', I'm actually just saying how thick I am and how fabulous our kidneys are. It's not the same thing.)
too soon yet in our country to say that every man who cannot find employment, but who can find uncultivated land, shall be at liberty to cultivate it, paying a moderate rent. But it is not too soon to provide by every possible means that as few as possible shall be without a little portion of land. The small
I am not qualified to say what is a disorder and what is not but clearly neither are these DSM task forces that keep pumping out these manuals! Sexual violence is a problem but it’s not a mental illness (if anyone has a mental illness it’s the victim of the assault. PTSD, depression, anxiety etc can occur after experiencing a rape). It is a deeply ingrained belief that men are dominate over women, that women ask to be raped and that men are not responsible for their violence because “boys will be boys”.
Overall though I enjoyed the story. It is a somewhat comic look at a crazy society and at how an already complex problem (a murder) can become even more complex when society is so different from what we consider normal. A great read for those who love science fiction with a light tone to it. The illustration wasn't my favorite; lots of pastel colors and sometimes hard to follow...but it was okay. If you are a Jack Vance fan or a sci-fi fan I would recommend giving it a read through.
Maybe you can tell from the yellowing of the paper on the cover of Tome II that it's older than Tome I. I bought Tome II at a book sale in 1975 or 1976, when I had just finished a year-long U of Minn night school course in basic French, and only a few years after I had finished a really fine course in medieval history at the U. I knew it was an important piece of French literature, and I wanted to see if I could read it in an edition published for French speakers (Nouveaux Classiques Larousse).
Remember to pause and give thanks,
Faith and Angel, joined by magic heroin go through some life events in Angel’s life. Some of these worked better than others, but overall an excellent concept for an episode.
Or... you're writing an important or difficult post.
Can't get a much better day than that!
Seantor Marco Rubio (R-Fl) is very rapidly becoming the VP choice for the Republicans. Kind of strange to have a VP before a P. (Oh it’s going to be Romney but how much of a stink will Santorum and the Religious right put up BEFORE they endorse Romney?)
For example: Sally sprinted toward the bank. The clock struck twelve. Five minutes before the deadline. If she didn’t make it in time, her husband would die.
Ac 10:38 How God anointed Jesus of Nazareth with the Holy Spirit and with power, who went about doing good and healing all who were oppressed by the devil; for God was with Him.
water 6 cups
I thought I’d share this with you today as D went into school well, “had a settled day” according to her diary, came out well and we had a nice evening – I think the fact it wasn’t raining helped.
I mean, you really can't go wrong with anything those "Baked" guys make! This one's so so good.
Right now, time management is the key to not going crazy! Basically every moment of my day is scheduled. Just a warning to any college student going to do an internship, make sure you have the time or can make the time.
fill it with joy and cheer
Andrew Caldwell left the group after Bite It. They soldiered on as a three piece and even put out a second album in 1998. After this they shortly split.
was a byword for robusta and arabica coffees.
Here we are giving you some leap year love!
So that's how my weekend went from Army duty to sex shop!
I think my only grumble (as usual with books like this) is that it isn't any longer! But there are plenty more in the series to keep me occupied. These include Dreams at Silver Spires and Success at Silver Spires.Ann Bryant has created a wonderful series - go read it!
I was thinking I spend too much time wishing and not enough time doing.
While wandering back from the driveway at the end of the day, I nearly jumped for joy when I noticed the first ever bloom on one of my Desert Roses appearing. It seems odd that it's the littlest of the two Adeniums that is about to flower first, but I'm not complaining. Maybe the April shower gave it the boost it needed. I'll be out there every morning now waiting to see the bloom.
Happy Easter.
Don’t politicians make deals all the time? If we arrested every politician that traded their vote on an issue for something else that they wanted in return, would we have anyone in congress?
You tell me! Fucking awesome!
instead of giving him the information straight up, the easy way.
In an effort to keep things interesting here on "Fresh Fabrics Friday" I thought it would be fun to occasionally share "Fresh Fabric Projects." So today, inspired by Jenn at A Home in the Making and her awesome ombre dye pillow, I have scouted several ways to either create a beautiful pillow from scratch or to embellish a perfectly decent, but ordinary pillow. The links below each photo contain tutorials for creating these clever cushions.
When did you quench my all heat?
Like the title says this is the second and last secretproject. It's a podcast. Not just any podcast though. It's a two hour long collaberative podcast with our good friend Bersercules. You read that right folks, two hours.
Yes, it might be uncomfortable or even painful at times… welcome to life.
When I get like this I find myself asking, "Is it worth it?"
Compassion believes that all farm animals – from dairy cows to laying hens – deserve a life worth living. We campaign for legislation and enforcement of existing laws to protect animals; we work with food companies and retailers to champion ethical farming; and we carry out hard-hitting investigations to expose farm animal cruelty.
I chose Project Management.
“Oh, mom, you should see her,” Isaac is having way too much fun embarrassing Isaiah. “She prances up to the fence, strutting like a call girl on the strip in Vegas. I swear, she preens, and poses, and then as soon as she sees Isaiah coming toward her, she cowers like a school girl. She should be ashamed of the way she is acting. I mean really, a poodle and a wolf?”
All I know is I presumably get to see Chester Bennington mutilated in some sort of automobile-related death trap. In 3D.
You see where this is headed. The chinchilla died while in our keep–right out on the back porch. Death, as I have mentioned, was clear to me at age four. I had the following facts:
alone on the river
We are working to convert the guest room into the playroom......this was our start.
There is a FANTASTIC prize package waiting for you! All you have to do to be eligible is...
We are being dehumanised and made a non people. We must abandon this inculcated niceness, this apologetic approach and assert our selves. We need to give our people a sense of their collective worth for the common good. The next generation need to be built up to inherit the responsibility for our life and culture. The media are occupying them with what to wear, how to get their hair done and where to have a tat! It is done to get their money and is morally evil as they are being debauched by temptations and enticements.
I have been trying to figure out for over a month why I liked Bier’s In a Better World so much when I was left nonplussed by After the Wedding. One possible reason is that I could easily identify myself with the incredibly real characters of the two 10-year old or so schoolboys and the peer pressure to agree to do certain morally wrong actions because you value more the friendships that you develop in school than ethics that you have adopted during your upbringing. Another possible reason I liked the film was the Gandhian parent who taught his children to develop moral strength rather than give in to bullies. A third reason was the underscoring of the effect of the absence of a mother on a growing child. A fourth possible reason I loved the film was the suggestion that seeds of terrorism can be easily be sown in the minds of youngsters when parents are separating or divorcing. A fifth likely reason was the awesome screen presence of the actor Mikael Presbrandt as the Gandhian father and a surgeon, who spends time in Africa providing medical care for victims of civil strife in an unspecified country, putting his Hippocratic oath above all other values and his conscience—at least for some time.
They also paid tribute to some bands that actually deserve it, but these "tributes" are more "defamation/defecation" than tribute...
i had to sand them because there was quite a bit of build-up from 8 years of use.
Next up was a great bit of crowd participationerationfrom Lucky Dragons, set up in front of the stage in Boxxxxxed. They began with a bit of ethereal ambient bloopery before starting to manipulate a brace of plastic sheets underneath some sort of light-sensitive-sensor which triggered responses in the sounds. They then encouraged people in the audience to have a go themselves, and that was how the rest of the set passed. It was lovely – unsurprisingly, the first few folk to have a stab started cautiously, but before too long people were trying to work out different ways of moving/bending/folding the sheets, putting objects on top on top of them etc. I didn’t participate myself but was it was lovely to watch the happy looks on people’s faces. An altogether joyful thing to see.
Prepare jars and lids.
TechOnWire providers computer technical support, computer optimization service, computer support,
This is a quick guide to tailoring your message for the metro media. If you think your message is not getting out, there may be ways for farmers to rope in the services of an experienced PR, or to catch the attention of a freelance journalist who might possess a measure of credibility with some metro editors. Remember, though, that a PR is not the same thing as a freelancer even though some of the things they do are identical, like pitching ideas to editors. What sets them apart is largely the matter of 'interest': a PR is paid by the interested party to do the communication while a freelancer is paid by the editor at the other end of the chain of information.
For Your mercy reaches unto the heavens,
New media in a way helps to enhance the old media but in some cases it seems to start to replace it. For example new media can help the movie industry by allowing people to quickly look up information about the movies online and read up on the reviews and prices and times. All conveniently and easily from their home or on the go on the smartphones. It takes away the fear of dealing with people on the phone line or confusion of dealing with automated phone system. Online movie sites make it much easier to find the information without the hassle. As in the example new media helps business to reach consumer at their own pace. It helps them connect and show off the product at a more personal level. And people looking for information can easily find it with the help of the computer. Internet or network is vital to new media for that reason. It is a way of connecting people to a bigger picture.New media is basically a big network of people and products from all over the world collected in one area. So in a way it enhances the old media. Books are also now available in the ebook format. With ebook it is cheaper to buy then paper version and it can also be enhanced by including animated parts or ability to have it also be audio file.
3/4 c cocoa powder
Draw a line 18" long on top
Sprinkle a teaspoon of sugar( this feeds the yeast) and 2-3 teaspoons of dry yeast over the liquid. when the yeast starts to bubble,( about 5-7 mins) carefully stir the mixture starting in the centre, and folding in the flour as you go.
Zimbabwe is also very far down the list, ranked at 166 with a rating of only 1.8. The Democratic Republic of Congo, Equatorial Guinea, Chad and Sudan are the other African countries rated below Zimbabwe on a list that numbers 180 overall positions.
For those of you who "collect" blazers in other colors, Tobi.com has a whole rainbow of them.
And now, Lord, behold their threatenings: and grant unto thy servants, that with all boldness they may speak thy word, By stretching forth thine hand to heal; and that signs and wonders may be done by the name of thy holy child Jesus.
David Halperin’s recent book, What Do Gay Men Want? (2), explores the possibilities of a re-theorization of gay subjectivity in opposition to the psychological questions raised by the putative rise in gay men’s increasingly risky sexual behavior. Let me summarize very briefly: Halperin argues that the moralizing public conversation about “barebacking” slides easily and quickly into a psychologically (re)pathologizing discourse that locates gay male subjectivity in the perverse, abnormal, dieased, self-hating, etc.–the very discourses gay men and women have been working to overthrow since at least the 1960s.(3) Halperin explains the rise in risky behavior in signifantly different terms, seeing gay men as ongoing agent-negotiators-resisters who opt for safer strategies of risk reduction to maximize or maintain access to pleasure; he uses epidemiological and sociological research to demonstrate the rationality (as opposed to pathology, but not in a rational choice sense of the word) of gay men’s sexual choices in the face of what is known about HIV transmission, and moves to an etended engagement with an essay by Michael Warner from a 1994 Village Voice in which Warner discloses his own risky behavior and calls for an explanation and engagement with gay male subjectivity on its own terms. The essay is of great importance to those working in public health in HIV prevention among men who have sex with men, but I’m going to leave aside those issues for my purposes here in talking about the implications of Halperin’s emergent theory of gay male subjectivity (4) and what it ma reveal about the gay men I studied and the normative conclusions I drew from my research.
Add chocolate mixture and vanilla.
accompany + ing = accompanying
But no such roses see I in her cheeks;
Glory in the slightest breeze wafting over the steaming land.
Hello, Catherine…welcome back to reality..Haven’t seen you here in years!!!
Good thing I'm well stocked up on sleep. Since late November, when The Bone Feeder wrapped, I've been lounging in a pleasurable creative limbo - sleeping, reading (comics and newspapers mostly, though other books have crept in) and, I admit it, sampling the various crappy programmes that passes for TV these days (I now know all I really wanted to know about Gypsy Weddings, the inner workings of the restaurant industry and old antiques. I draw the line at spending any time on the X Factor, though. Just the adverts are cringeworthy.) I've caught up with a few excellent films on DVD too, spent lots of 'couple time' with my lovely squeeze, and we've done a bit of travelling around the South Island where I've been based for the summer. (I should mention that my creative laziness contrasts with my work in the medical realm, as I've had locums right through Xmas and January).
The film opens up with the end of the world. Two Air Force officers, Tannen and Denton, in charge of a missile silo in California get the call to launch the arsenal according to the MAD strategy of mutually assured destruction. Three years later, the silo is still in operation, but the command structure has fallen apart. Tannen has resigned his commission and indulged his misfit ways. Denton, his former superior, is a hardnosed major still holding things together. An explosion at the silo kills all but four men, so Denton decides to take the survivors on a trip to Albany in search of a lone radio transmission.
"Just a chat," I try to keep my voice light. "I'll let you get back to Robbie. Have fun!"
Fortunately, while researching workboxes, I discovered how another blogger used marker boards to organize her kids' assignments using workbox labels (and markers), enabling her to achieve much the same effect as workboxes without the space required for them (since all the needed items for the day fit into one box instead of many). I tell about how I am using markerboards this year in my post on Organizing Our School...1,2,3, Help!. Using the boards is the way I have of translating the "lesson plans" I see in my head to "paper" so the kids can implement the plan without me holding their hand every step of the way. Eventually, we want them all to be self-directed learners, like their older brothers.
● The investor has the potential to receive an extremely high-level return on
On December 14, 2008, the First Trumpet of the Seventh Seal of the Book of Revelation sounded, which announced the beginning collapse of the economy of the United States and great destruction that will follow. The next three trumpets will result in the total collapse of the United States, and once the Fifth Trumpet sounds the world will be thrust into WW III.”
Price: 0/10
In the special report, CNN writes, ” Ibori employed a range of methods, some straightforward, some devious. He inflated contracts, took kickbacks, and simply transferred cash out of state accounts. He was helped by his family, wife and mistress, as well as by London-based professionals, who set up shell companies, assisted in purchases and provided false due diligence.
"A focus on number of users doesn't tell the full story," said Mark Dolliver, eMarketer analyst and author of the new report, "Black Consumers and Mobile: Digital Lives Lived in Motion." "If mobile usage is no longer more common among black consumers than the rest of the US population, it is nonetheless more important to many of them. They have a higher-than-average propensity to use their phones as their chief means of going online. Indeed, the widespread adoption of smartphones among blacks has helped to close the old digital divide' in internet access while perhaps creating a new one in the kind of online usage people typically experience."
At first, I was like, for real? Am I really seeing this? She wants $5 for a tutorial you can download for free on Sabine Lippert's website? Then I looked a little closer and, lo and behold!, she was charging $5 a pop for two of my free tutorials that I published when I was over at About.com!
Got hurricanes? Blizzards? Ill-tempered computers?
"I only have diamonds, clubs and spades," Tom said heartlessly.
And so with that important caveat in place, here’s my take of what will be obvious to all on Tuesday morning.
3) Pee-Pee Jokes Are Happy-Fun-Time – Why write a sophisticated joke about politics or the state of the world when I can just as easily talk about my nardsack? If only I could combine the two…
Secret Service spokesman told reporters a large effigy of Mr Obama was found hanging along Main Street in the small town of Plains, Georgia, Saturday morning.
Blind Side HSV new alert box (SBZA) is optional on all models of the E3 - and is standard on the Grange.
Yes, yes. I know its a web page about plastics. Amorphous polymers behave like glass. They have a glass transition range, and can undergo devitrification. In fact, pretty much any material, heated up and cooled correctly, can go through a glass phase - including metals. This has been well-documented since the 1960s. (And if you don't know what a glass transition is, maybe you should do a little googling, or maybe a lot).
Howe is an extraordinary showroom in Pimlico that is owned by the aforementioned antiques dealer/restorer Christopher Howe. CH obviously has a keen eye for spotting great antique and vintage pieces. He's also quite adept at designing new furniture and lighting as evidenced by his bespoke collection, which is handmade in England. With a background in sculpting, CH has a reverence for form and texture. He believes in pure, timeless design and his furniture and lighting collections certainly reflect that ethos. And with all of his passion for and knowledge of antiques, there's no doubt that Howe's custom pieces are created with the highest level of craftsmanship and artistry.
and told my father I was hungry.
In the first class cabins, the crash was faint and served as no alarm at all. For most of them the collision went unnoticed except for those who were still awake in their cabins. A few noticed that the ship has stopped sailing since the sounds of the engines could no longer be heard. In the smoking room, the men felt a tiny jolt, not enough to cautioned them about any potential danger so they continued with their nightly event of drinking, smoking and sharing business ideologies.
Well, I’ve got a request. Please.
That was always his example to me to show how much he loved his pickled herring in cream sauce.
Yet there is enough grief and guilt
You may not know this, either, but there are three primary names of God in the Old Testament:
So it is with America.
These were some lung-busting hills, ups and downs and perfect for the day’s prescribed hill fartlek workout. Lucho told me to push the hills to the top and recover on the flats and the downhills. I started on the Toyon trail and connected to the Los Trancos trail. It was a rolling, single-track trail with some of the hills lasting a mile or more, and the downhills were long and steep, leaf-covered trails shaded by tree canopies, beautiful twisting trails that my eyes took in ten feet at a time. I was pretty emotional on this run, thinking about Sharlie resting back at her temporary home, strapped to an oxygen machine and waiting for the call that would take her to the hospital and change her life forever. They told her it could come at anytime, but she may have to wait for months. I pictured her on the trails, walking slowly with her son to the lake, feeding the ducks and speaking in whispers as the fawn ate grass just below the trail. I also pictured her recovering here, with new lungs and a new heart, I pictured her running, and sharing the trail with me. I don't do much praying, but if I could will that to happen through prayer, meditation, or focused thought, Tuesday’s run may have helped push that dream a little closer to reality.
Therapist: If i can
I also made the decision to prep for the workout by downing an orange (also refrigerated) 20 minutes before the workout, for a little energy and some vitamins. I haven’t eaten much today, and I figured this would be a helpful little boost.
Sweet potato casserole (prepped and ready to go into the oven for 30 minutes)
Saturday I spent several hours at the bi-annual rummage sale in our church. That was fun because we got to chat while helping, plus at the end of the sale, we had a dollar for a bag, and boy did I snag some awesome stuff. For a buck. One dollar. You can tell I am thrilled. After that, and I had a whole list, I did manage to get a bunch of laundry and house stuff done, then sat down to watch TV. Undisturbed. For hours. I got up to make dinner and do some baking and that was it. Two episodes of Eureka, two of Warehouse 13, 1 of DS9 and half of William Shatner’s “the Captains” documentary later I was asleep on the couch and it was time for bed. A wonderful finish to a superb day.
Santa, a red exclamation in a white world, walks the reindeer line, stroking sugar-and-cinnamon fur. The reindeer shiver and snort and stamp their hooves, the lines connecting them to the parcel-laden sleigh jingling. Santa looks over to his candy-brick castle and waves good-bye, but no one stands in the doorway to wave back. With a sigh, he climbs onto the sleigh's driver's seat, the bench creaking beneath his weight. He pauses, holding the smooth and supple leather reins, and considers how to start the team. Onward? A-heya? Giddyup? Ho-ho? No, he's already used those. He makes a point of uttering a different word to inaugurate every outing, because he's been doing this for a long time, and if he didn't deliberately insert some bit of novelty into the procedure, he fears his jolly round head might well explode. That is another detail.Enjoy the rest of van Eekhout's "In The Late December" over at Strange Horizons.
Biologically men have hormones which were originally intended to make them great hunters, providers and protectors. Basic human culture has evolved and two things have happened; men no longer use the male hormones in the circumstances for which they were intended millions of years ago, and women are now as responsible for the hunting, providing and protecting.
Before this one, though, I started one in oils, it is going well, but I have to wait for it to dry before going further. That’s why I’m using acrylics on the one above.
My deepest dark corners find confidence frayed
However, the announcement of three panelists – journalist Dileep Padgaonkar, conflict resolution academic Radha Kumar, and Information Commissioner M M Ansari – has disappointed most people and attracted anger and ridicule. To many, it represents a desperate anxiety to pretend – just before President Obama’s visit to India – that the government is sincerely grappling with the Kashmir issue. The Valley’s moderates as well as extremists have declared the panel a non-starter. Indian parties, from the Left to the Right, have attacked its exclusion of politicians, who they feel should lead it. Their unanimous opinion is that the Centre is not serious about finding a Kashmir solution. There is no support for the panel from political, civil society or intellectual opinion, not even the ruling Congress.
The smiles and the hopes that I saw on the residents’ faces made the effort worthwhile. 9 employers offered 362 jobs for immediate filling at the job fair. And these are jobs within 30min of HG. We’re still some way from fulfilling the potential of this Job Hub. But we are on the right track. Some residents told me that they loved having assistance right in their neighborhood.
Meanwhile, Mr. C posted on FB that his book was published and urged everyone to come to his book party. I also received a separate email invitation. That prompted me to post my congrats on FB with a sentence that I was sorry to miss the party but I'd be out of town. Forever. (Kidding.)
24. The 1987 Detroit Lions roster
Cover and bake for 40 minutes
- Please keep the process to enter your giveaway as simple as possible.
I know – we’ve all heard this stuff before at least a thousand times. Everywhere you look there’s somebody touting the latest diet that guarantees you will lose 20 pounds in 20 days. But until I discovered the best way for me, it was all just noise. I had to be determined, dedicated and yes, stubborn about wanting to lose weight. No excuses. Going to the gym 4 times a week. Every week. I’ve never done that before in my life, but I have to say after missing one day last week I actually felt deprived! Weird.
I bake.(Though I'm getting worse at it with every passing day)
According to Amherst police logs (12:38 AM, early Sunday morning):
Well, being a Lovecraft story, you can probably take a wild guess.
You may not believe this because of the stuff I waffle on about, but I have a degree in English Literature. I am obsessed with books. So one of my top parenting objectives has always been to introduce my children to the wonderful world of literature and where better to start than the land of children's books. And because they are getting older, we have progressed onto reading chapter books at bedtime whilst The Toddler has his milk.
Then I was asked which one or two of the issues would I pick as the biggest priorities.
Please note that CCA and American Traffic Solutions, who does our red light camera’s and has no employee’s in broward county or the state of Florida, use the same lobbyist? Please note the lobbyist are suing us since we canceled the contract. This is odd since they filed against the city without even requesting that we provide services.
02 - Night After Night
MOTHER (V.O.)
Buff: As Vice President there will be times when you and he will have to have private meetings behind closed doors. Do you think you'll be able to handle it?
Just because this was all based on a book ("The Year of the Angry Rabbit" by Russell Braddon) does nothing to make this any more plausible. THIS IS A MOVIE ABOUT GIANT KILLER RABBITS. It has close-ups of bunnies with little splotches of red makeup around their tiny jowls, all filmed in forced perspective as they hippety-hop their swath of detruction across tiny desert vistas. It has a hapless police officer shouting a line to end all lines: "Attention! Attention! Ladies and gentlemen, attention! There is a herd of killer rabbits headed this way and we desperately need your help!".... In other words, this is a horror movie without any horror. If The Birds were made like this, Tippi Hedren would have no career. In fact, this movie didn't even make back its....
Blue Card: Stampin' Up
As expected, she’s uncomfortable at first, but later proves to be a natural. She makes enough in cash tips to pay her mortgage and even saves the marriage of one of her clients. Saves a marriage? Yes; she listens to him and give him advice on how to reconnect with his wife. She even has a heart-to-heart with the wife (Mimi Rogers) after the wife vandalizes Riley’s car, stalks Riley, and follows Riley home.
The Little Dolphin Estate on the Cayman Brac is located amidst greenery near the northern beaches of the island. Cayman Brac is known for the world-class rock climbing facility it offers at The Bluff, a vertical cliff on its eastern coast that rises dramatically above the sea to 140 feet.
My Brilliant Career
This fair we will be taking a browser containing mounted but unframed original paintings, drawings and etchings by Miles Heseltine, John Howard, Chris Rigby and me, which is an opportunity to get your self some gorgeous art at a lower price.
The descendants of Masembura still reside in their country but they are very few now.
I did think it was cute but I also realized I was taking a risk by using a beach theme. I'm looking forward to seeing what did make the cut for the call, as I really wasn'T sure what they were looking for.
5. The Complete Margaret Fulton Cookbook
- apple
I stood there on the second floor balcony of my office watching all of this. I had no idea how to get to that ground. I could see it but I did not know which road around my office area led to the ground where lonely whiny doggie was trapped. I went downstairs and trusted my instincts to take me in the direction of the ground. Luckily the ground was right besides my office building. So I ran to the ground found the dog told him I’ll get him out and to hang on. He backed up a bit to let me push open the very heavy gate (yes! Dogs understand when you talk to them.) I unlatched the gate let him out and he was so happy and so was his other friend the dog.
That little thing on the top left is a book I made.
It gives you a feel for what is flattering on your face and what colors/cuts you might not love. I think my kids are going to have a blast with this one!
I had seen cards made with these by some of my extremely talented Facebook friends and thought I would give it a go...
The media will lie and lie and twist and squirm, however, the glaring fact is the research suggests that native white Britons are at least twenty times less likely to be involved in the disgusting crime of child sexual grooming than are the mass ranks of newcomers to our country.
“The national director of GetUp, Simon Sheikh, said Mr Hartcher should apologise, as it was “not currently campaigning” on live exports.
A A
It’s not Constitutional to take law abiding people’s weapons.
If the chain turns at idle it may be caused by one or more of the following:
6For of this sort are they which creep into houses, and lead captive silly women laden with sins, led away with divers lusts,
I'm not ashamed to say there were a few tears shed.
In all the silly stuff that’s talked about lazy speech or impediments or any kind of terminology to describe some kind of failure or incorrectness in the way people speak, people never refer to the fact that RP or estuary speech does not show people sounding out the ‘r’ that most US, Irish, Caribbean and west country and Lancashire and Scots people sound. Apparently a speaker like me is not lazy or failing or impeded in my speech for not sounding out the “r” in card or short.
Sticking my hand in a wolf trap.
You’re sick. You’ve been diagnosed with diabetes and this means that your life expectancy is statistically reduced by 7 to 10 years. But with proper diet and lifestyle changes you can beat this disease. In fact, if you are willing to change the way you eat and a few of your living habits, your diabetes medication can probably either be stopped or drastically reduced. Some authorities claim that just by adhering to a proper diet, quitting smoking and getting a little more exercise over 60% of the currently prescribed medications for diabetes would be unneeded.
Chippie = Mr. Chip
Q: Who does Michael Jackson consider a Perfect “10″?
One cup broth
Up for you today I've got a fun lil' coupon adventure - but a good one just the same. I sent my husband (Rob) to the store to get milk, bread and eggs - the things that we have to get almost weekly - and when he came home he asked me if I had any Right Guard coupons. I didn't, but I went online and found some - - Coupons.com and RedPlum.com. He had found Right Guard on a clearance table at Albertsons for $1 each. So off he went back with (4) $1 off 1 coupons, and (2) $3 off 2 coupons. Because the $3 off of 2 would have him getting overage, they gave him back (2) of the $1 off coupons, so he went and got 2 more - LOL
*Last weekend, we were at Bridgewater State College for a huge YMCA swim meet. I took videos of B (who swam extremely well, thanks for asking), but I also found myself loving this coach from another team. He kept many of us entertained when our swimmers were not in the pool. So, I took a video of him and added a little music....
Kisses xxx
And this leads to the second false premise of Internet dating: that choosing a mate should be a rational choice, in which people carefully comparison-shop for partners. That’s the advantage, after all, of having millions of profiles to choose from. Rather than being misled by our instincts on a first date, we can calmly sort through the alternatives and find the best possible spouse, the would-be soul mate who will maximize our romantic utility.
these are the steps to follow:
4. Your country’s flag is not a car decoration.
Fishfaggish – A scolding, foul-mouthed woman.
In the work we see the vision of the saint occurring at the moment of Consecration of the Eucharist when the prayer of Jesus at the Last Supper is repeated by the priest.
But what a very strange, feeble attempt to educate the t-shirt and seashell-buying tourist trade: the prevalence of banners on every lightpost up and down the street, rainbow colored banners sporting folksy caricatures of Ed Ricketts and John Steinbeck, the reverse sides of the flags bearing quotes about Doc and Cannery Row.
OK, so now let's get down to the nuts and bolts of putting this cover together. I needed several things: A font, an image, and a tool to design the cover in.
she told me that it was c and i, as angels. i remember looking at that picture every day, thinking that my mom saw my sister and i as angels, and how we would never be so affectionate with each other as the cherubs in the pictures.
We are still just as different and I would assume that not many would understand the connection. If I had to look to closely I might not either. But I have trust the feelings that I had as a 5 year old and know that we share something that is beyond words, beyond explanation and accept the other exactly as we are.. no demands, just enjoying the moment and perhaps the quiet!
Fortunately, the maintenance man got it fixed quickly enough, but I have to admit that I lived in fear of flushing the entire rest of the weekend.
this week is going so much better, and so far I have been;
We were doing music therapy tonight. We work him out while he sits there and listens. This time my mom had him, and she was clapping his hands together. She let go, and he just kept going. Once I had the camera on him though, he got cold feet and couldn't perform. I am just super excited and had to share!
But a child that watches Sesame Street, Dora, Maisy and reads related books, can't be kept from the alphabet. And about 2 months ago she suddenly fell in love with letters. And when I wasn't looking, she learnt the ABC song. And, amusingly, says the American Zee as well as the British Zed in turns. She loves to sing it.
For your ceremony aisle consider skipping flower petals in the decor or limit them to the edge of the aisle because you can easily slip on them.
4 nor
Welcome to another happy Saturday here at the Crazy 4 Challenges Blog!!
We have never fed our dogs food from the table, but that doesn't stop them from trying. They instinctively know how to pour on the pathos, beaming at you with those large, soulful eyes and an expression that says "I haven't eaten in months." Who knows, maybe this year a gullible guest won't know the house rules? (I think Baxter still remembers our friend in Southern Oregon who would "accidentally" drop bits of food as she ate...one Thanksgiving he didn't leave her side for several hours.)
Mix a drink.
Further, those who complete vocational training in prison, LBB found, tend to have higher salaries upon release, according to a study of prisoners who exited state custody in 2008. Those who completed Windham programs averaged $9,384 per year in wages compared to $8,128 for those who did not participate. Another notable finding: Most offenders who enter vocational programming complete it, but those who drop out while in prison are at especially high risk of failing to find a job when they get out. Prisoners who enter vocational ed but fail to complete it have lower employment rates, even, than those who never participated in any programming at all. And they make less money: On average, just $7,698 per year. (Think about how difficult it would be to live on even the higher of those amounts, btw.)
I am corresponding with a lady that is about 20 minutes from me who has a very lovely coming 6yo Hanoverian mare that she is looking to lease and/or sell. This mare has been handled and trained very nicely, and I hope to go ride her soon. The tricky part will be getting her to my barn, as we have no current open stalls, and figuring out how to pay for all of it!
Consider for example the story of the rich young man. He is only told to go out and sell all he has after assuring Our Lord that he keeps the commandments (Luke 16):
1 tablespoon rice wine vinegar
Please sign the petition below to seek the Prime Minister's intervention to stop Crystal Palace football club from falling into the hands of the faceless financial businessmen whose only interest is monetary gain.
Once you get the foundation of your branding started . . . that is, understanding how people perceive your small business and writing a customer-centric mission statement that everyone knows by heart . . . you can begin creating brand awareness and developing a personality with which consumers and stakeholders can relate and will want to interact. Keep your branding goals in mind as you develop marketing strategies to deliver consistent messages across all media to avoid confusion. If you want to be classy and trendy, all of your print, radio, TV, online, social and mobile media should resonate with a classy, trendy look, feel and sound.
I used to talk and talk –and talk — about what I thought mom needed to do. Sometimes I was right–(stop driving at 95, receive radiation treatments for cancer, stop going down a steep flight of stairs to get your hair done) but if she wouldn’t listen he would step in, using his maleness and the oldest child influence to move her into submission. Now it is harder for him because she can’t hear. But she also trusts me to make the right decision for her.
behind the lens.
Drop the bagels 3 – 4 at a time into the simmering water (depending on how large your pot is).
Every year, scores of youngsters from across India audition for possibly the biggest fashion event in the country -- Lakme Fashion Week.
Marks camera crew come to take video, me and T talk about how we hate being on video, "I hate when people ask me 'so what places have you been' I'm like 'I've been doing this for 5 YEARS, I don't know! Want me to list them?"
For the flowers, I used the same technique as you would for a felt flower, the burlap is a little harder to work with, but with hot glue you can get it to stay in place. The original tutorial shows exactly how she did her flowers. I put tape on the back of the flowers so I could arrange and rearrange them until I liked it.
In a sign of resistance to the coup leaders, the National Union of Workers of Guinea-Bissau (UNTG) which represents mainly public sector workers, issued a call for a general strike on Monday to protest the coup.
Irish banks are likely to remain unable to provide such financing facilities on a widespread basis for some time to come. And foreign lenders are not likely to be very anxious to return to such lending until domestic banks can first show such confidence. Exceptional measures are required if we are to progress matters.
Thursday - CSA beer brat with cabbage slaw
In the INSIGHT e-newsletter of the Committee for Perth, Brad Pettitt writes council decided “to increase heights and densities in the non-heritage parts of the city.” That is factually wrong! The PSA 49 area is opposite the historic Railway Station, adjacent to the historic FTI and Princess May buildings, opposite the heritage listed Victoria Hall, all around the historic Town Hall, and opposite the heritage listed Henderson Street Warders Cottages.
He said, ”I’m very sorry for this mistake. You see, I pulled up behind your car while you were blowing your horn, flipping off the guy in front of you and cussing a blue streak at him. I noticed the ‘What Would Jesus Do’ bumper sticker, the ‘Choose Life’ license plate holder, the ‘Follow Me to Sunday-School’ bumper sticker, and the chrome-plated Christian fish emblem on the trunk, so naturally….I assumed you had stolen the car.”
Probably not, unless you were writing a spoof (though it would be funny to have a self-deprecating autobiography told in the same epic voice as the sci-fi story on intergalactic warfare). I’m of the opinion that a story’s voice should serve the story, should set the tone, create the mood, entice the reader with its sound, not sound like you talking on the page like you would your friends over coffee or beers. I find that when you get caught up with voice, you walk into that little hole where your writing becomes less about the story and more about you. Which means that I’m about to stop reading. So often, voice does not serve story, especially if a writer has a unique voice that is very distinctive and very much part of a certain time period.
Time for another instalment in my irregular series of clock projects. (Or should that be “Time for another instalment in the series of irregular clock projects”?) In contrast with the extreme “blinkiness” of Clock One, in this article we describe how to build this single-digit digital clock:
Toby’s plight is enhanced by two exceptional villains in the forms of Zebediah Petch, Toby’s violent and criminal uncle, and Alistair Windlass, his ruthless father. Ellen’s villains work so exceptionally well because they are morally ambiguous - there is always the hint of just a little bit of good in them, despite their ruthlessness and cunning. Her treatment of them serves to make them completely believable - and frightening. And trapped between the desires of these two characters, Toby, a feisty boy in his own right, has to fight for his life and his personal and moral integrity.
after being convicted on spy charges. I’ve been reaching out to both
This is a compiled post, Source Links have been given, They have all the rights.
Green Top, Violet Cummerband and Black Norma Jeans
I would not defend Gilmour Jr.'s behaviour for one moment, but NEITHER WOULD HE ! He does not need to be shown the error of his ways. He should be punished for misbehaving and deterred from doing it again. So make him pick up litter and dog poo for a couple of months, maybe more. Empty his piggy bank if you like, but bear in mind that he knows people who can replenish it quite readily. That way we get to save money, he's duly punished/deterred/humiliated and everyone's a winner.
Kimberly then took us to this little bar in the gay district called De Barderij. It was so nice. (See pictures below.) An old building with this little windowed alcove off the back, it was so cosy and friendly there. I could have stayed all night. We just had one beer there, but the bartender invited us to come back later for the drag show. We said we would.
There's a scene in "Finding Nemo" that keeps running through my head these days. It's the part where Nemo is encouraging the Tuna, who are about to be captured and reeled up in a gigantic net by a fishing boat to keep swimming down, in an effort to break the mast holding the net and setting them all free. "Keep swimming...keep swimming..." they all chant together.
(34)
That should be simply a Common Sensical Direction that we as LIFE as Inhabitants of this planet would be moving towards. Evolution…Doing what is within our power to provide sustenance to all Equally, to provide education and luxuries that we know so many others would also enjoy experiencing. But this is Not Happening. It is more like – How can we continue to procrastinate and not actually “do what is best for humanity” because “my life is working” I mean it is complete ignorance.
I believe in God, the Father Almighty, Creator of Heaven and earth; and in Jesus Christ, His only Son, Our Lord, Who was conceived by the Holy Ghost, born of the Virgin Mary, suffered under Pontius Pilate, was crucified; died, and was buried. He descended into Hell; the third day He arose again from the dead; He ascended into Heaven, sitteth at the right hand of God, the Father Almighty; from thence He shall come to judge the living and the dead. I believe in the Holy Spirit, the holy Catholic Church, the communion of saints, the forgiveness of sins, the resurrection of the body, and the life everlasting. Amen.
In the mid-19th century, the British obsession with Indian curries and culture really started to take off (see this post for a brief history of Britain’s love of spice and India). It wasn’t just the spiciness, but the romance of the place. Queen Victoria loved the country and even had an Indian wing in the palace. Although she was the Empress of India, she never actually visited the country, leaving all that excitement to her sons.
Tomorrow: Nikka Whisky
Mr. Berns reminds us (in his Note 30) of the Saudi ambassador’s challenge –to my mind, an insulting challenge—as to whether the United States would have the “guts” to stand by its military obligations in his region. That was six years ago. Why are our ground troops still needed (if they are) to defend the Kuwaitis and Saudis, peoples who have a combined population roughly equal to that of Iraq and who have as well much greater resources? Why are they, with the help of the training and the latest military equipment available from us, not able by now to make it apparent to Saddam Hussein that they would be able to fend him off? One suspects that they are suffering from something like that welfare dependency which Mr. Berns properly deprecates elsewhere. One also suspects that their regimes are so poorly supported by their own peoples that they dare not build up adequate armies, for such armies might develop generals able to take over their countries as well as to deter the Iraqis.
Before I get started with my second letter, have to tell you all…I have heard back from The Romantic Date. I was floored…I honestly figured it was just a one-time thing but he sounds promising. He told me he has been thinking and dreaming of my soft kisses, tender touch and beautiful eyes. He did not mention how beautiful I was (obviously an oversight) but he does want to see me again, and he wants it to be a full-fledged date. I am thinking that would be nice.
We the People who are Beings of Light, children of our heavenly
Anymore, any less of what I think about myself
There are parents who put their kids in front of the T.V., my parents, mainly my mom, put me in front of the radio. My love for and addiction to music has always existed, without fail, without choice. Though my dad, for all intents and purposes, is a musician, this hunger and appetite comes from the woman who loved him. It is the biggest gift anyone has ever given me.
Now there is just one more thing to do before the basic block is finsihed, and that is to add your "flare lines". You don't HAVE to add these, but I always do as it helps me define the line of my final skirt. ie: If you want a flared skirt with godets you would put the godets where the flare lines are. Or if you wanted a panel skirt then you would cut where the flare lines are and these would then become seams.
For our struggle is not against flesh and blood, but against the rulers, against the authorities, against the powers of this dark world and against the spiritual forces of evil in the heavenly realms. Eph. 6:12
It is really a textbook and “is intended for high school students and undergraduates who have an on-going interest and some background in biology.”
On medium speed, slowly add the white chocolate ganache. Once combined you can add the eggs, one at a time, beating on low speed until each egg is incorporated. Once you’ve added all the eggs, mix in the vanilla and salt and divide into 2 pans (preferably with a pop out bottom for easier removal!)
and may God bless each stitch to shine.
At this point I should declare an interest, I think Aamer Anwar is a complete prick and so do many others, I knew him at Glasgow University.
Birthday presents included:
Kadie’s funeral was on the coldest day in January. Mara couldn’t have told anyone what the temperature was that day; the coldness was determined by the frozen state of her heart. It ran through her blood and seeped into her bones until it was impossible to imagine ever being warm again. Kadie was gone and with her the sun went, too.
A friend who was visiting walked in and intervened, Keeton’s wife told deputies. The friend was able to calm Keeton down and was able to get the gun from him, according to reports.
I'd already got another from the library, but it turns out it was book 3, so back to the library to get book 2.
CAFETERIA CATHOLICISM
The money should have been spent on building up something which has a future.
I love other writers. I went to college for writing. My best friend is a writer. I married a writer. I surround myself with writers. This especially helps when dark days come like the one I had this past weekend. Like I said, I love it when I get a line that fits perfectly, and as Meg and I were talking about my Regulators story, she made a quick comment about it and my face lit up. The sentence she uttered would go perfectly in my story. Later that night, I sat down to write more of my story, and something terrible happened: I froze. I remembered the line, and I wrote it down, but absolutely nothing else came out. It was the perfect line, but nothing was happening to it. That's when terrible occurrence #2 happened: I decided I would never be a writer. I wasn't good enough, I never was, and I never will be. Meg refused my decision, but I had already made it...until today.
If they did think that, it would be hard to fault their logic, for look at where we are, and look at where we came from.
The man lifted her hand towards his mouth and dipped his head. Was he going to kiss it better? She continued to smile, amused by his chivalry.
I’m going to check around the area and see if I can figure out what the hell’s going on around here. I’ll check back in later today.
words; fangless,
one another! Penni, Dave says it's time to come to Gods' country and pay
Polonez parcel service
Seven years ago I lost a job that meant a great deal to me. The agency where I worked and the office politics were terrible, there were questionable things going on within the agency with finances and various levels of discrimination and preferential treatment, but the families I got to meet and work with were incredible inspirations to me and the work I was doing was incredibly fulfilling.
Time and attention are all we have, so we should cherish those things above everything. We as individuals, as a species and as a community live by those simple limitations. We come into existence, we live, and we go on into the void but during our brief time of living we have our attention and we can choose to some degree where we place that attention and use our time.
As the attendants wraps the princess body, he sobs while holding the embroidery – the one that Bu Yong made but the princess took credit for – and as a tear fell into the embroidered butterfly… it becomes real.
Lately I was surprised to run across a term I’d never heard before, “Hebrew-Christians”. This is an old term appearing in historic census records from the Holy Land and Poland, referring to Jews who considered their ethnicity as Jewish but their religion to be Christian. Of course the earliest Christians were Jews, Christianity began with a small sect of Jews following Jesus, whom we know was also a Jew. I do not know how far back the term “Hebrew-Christian” was used. Undoubtedly there were “Hebrew-Christians” who dropped the Hebrew part of the expression and eventually were known only as “Christian”, this is why it is often so difficult for people to accept that their ancestors were Jewish. They had just never heard it said. Historical records of persecution give grand evidence for the reason why the “Hebrew” portion of the expression was dropped.
University and school administrators cannot ignore the dire need for security guards to go through college security training on a regular basis. In the aftermath of Virginia Tech’s darkest day, curriculums for advanced university security training were offered online to encourage widespread use. Besides implementing disaster plans and violence prevention, security officers must be able to identify risk situations involving alcohol, drugs, etc. Minor problems in dorms and student centers can escalate quickly without a skilled security team to control the situation.
It’s not that big difference but it’s a good start. I really seek to get to size 48 so soon…. because you can get nearly all trousers and skirts in that size. With my actual size I don’t wear what I want to (and I probaby would wear if I was slimmer) but what I can get in my size… and that is kind of sad. But well, I’ll make it, I know!!!!
I choose to trust The Holy Spirit at all times, to know the perfect things to say and do, to God’s glory in Christ Jesus! Amen!
Both of them!
My 8 year old daughter deeply related to Debbie Bass.Every night she asked to read another chapter of Journals of the Big Mouth Bass. She couldn’t wait to find out what Debbie was going to do next.
The truth is, these phone calls make the callers look stupid or arrogant.
We should be an encouragement to one another. We should be building our family and friends up, encouraging and supporting, commending and praising, not tearing them down and being an accessory to low self worth and value. People tend to live up to your expectations. Set the bar high, encourage people to achieve and praise them when they do and encourage them along the way as they need encouragement. We can teach and we can rebuke but we can do it in a spirit of love continuing to place value in each other.
My girls (and boy) were FREEZING their little butts off outside, miserable in the cold, hanging under their trailer....their water frozen....So we made it happen...
Bake at 475 for 35-40 minutes, turning chicken occasionally. I didn’t move the potatoes, because I like them when they get slightly crispy on one side. It’s usually the side that faces down, but because there was so much liquid in the pan, the side facing up was actually the one that got crispy in this case.
And you know... no matter what people say, these triplets are not replacement babies. Our hearts still ache for you, little girl. You'll never be replaced...you'll never be forgotten. You'll always be in my heart, and on my mind. How could we ever forget the little girl that made such big changes in our lives?
big ears flapping,
Lakosha appraised her. “Yes. It is the council’s wishes you travel there and follow the orders of one Crusader Powel in his attempts to better the youth of Stormwind.”
I bought these for the boys last week. I had intended to use them as props for my photo today, but I forgot to bring them in from my patio in my rush this morning. Hiaz. :( I wonder whether they will last till next year, lol. :P
you remembered
This is in contrast to the relatively rapid change in morphology that we see in sub-Saharan Africa—from a small, gracile, and almost childlike appearance, as typified by Pygmies and Khoisans, to a much larger and more robust body form. Just as radical has been the shift from a low rate of polygyny to a very high one.
B. The State Of The Millennium Or Kingdom
So, here I am, living in Brisbane, Australia for 5 months. A city that I came to visit two years ago and said, "What a great city this would be to live in!" It's idyllic. There's strong support for the arts, great cultural and economic diversity, amazing public resources, and we now have an awesome place to live in a great part of the city. I'm enjoying every minute of it. I've even picked up some freelance photography assignments already, and am using my skills to trade for some lifestyle extras I probably wouldn't splurge on if I had to pay Australian dollars for them. I'm getting a chance to read, exercise, write, relax, spend quality time with my husband, eat beautiful fresh fruits and veggies- which all seem like something I'd be able to do anywhere, but as many small business owners know, running the business is always on the mind because we can always do more for our clients or spend more time marketing and strategizing for our business. After 7 years of learning how to market and run a profitable business in three different states and very different demographic markets, I definitely feel like this is a much needed sabbatical for me and a nice reward for all the hard work I've done to get to this point.
Halloween has come and gone, Thanksgiving is just around the corner, and if you're planning on sending out Christmas cards, it's time to start thinking about it! This year, like last year, Shutterfly is hoping to make the Christmas card process easier on us!
Deeper than talking late into the night.
Snow White is the flattest of the princesses. Snow White was the first full-length animated film, so its novelty was not in the plot or characters, but the animation (Many of our action films do the same thing: there is a shallow plot and vague character development, but the real entertainment is in the special effects). Snow’s primary personality traits are her undying optimism and cheerfulness. She’s a princess forced to work as a scullery maid? No problem. Her stepmother the queen tries to kill her out of vanity? That’s a bit scary, but she’ll be fine. She moves into a cabin the woods with seven strange dwarves? No worries. She dies and is brought back to life by true love’s kiss? Well, she ended up alive, didn’t she? Her story isn’t about being saved by men (I’ll get to that), but about always focusing on the positive, and doing what you can in every situation. I will grant critics this: Snow White is constantly looking to men to save her. After her father dies, the huntsman saves her life. When she runs away, the dwarves take her into their home. After the queen kills her, the prince comes to her rescue. No matter how hard Snow White works, in the end, she has to rely on a man, which is a rather sad message to send.
Skypark is thankfully open to the public, not just hotel/casino guests - for an admission fee of $20SG=~$16US per adult.
So Einstein can complete his work.
He also said that the explanation for the creation of the world in the Book of Genesis could not be taken literally.
Ethnic cleansing?
They went through a whole list of possible beans,
-Jamie Barrientos
06. The Wedding Song 1960
The words could be Peggy Noonan’s. One would assume, as the victims of this latest massacre were not trained, uniformed combat troops, heavily-armed and armored, serving in a military occupation of an invaded and destroyed foreign country, but rather innocent civilians, many of them children, that the Noonans of the world would similarly cry out for justice, for vengeance, for retribution.
6. Hope I don't sit next to a laptop maniac.
Publisher: CreateSpace
A solitary llama grazes on the grass now growing through the impressive structures.
Card: Stampin' Up
I have a confession to make.
In my other, much more glamorous life, I am an urban dweller, living in a converted Leather District loft in Boston. And in that life, this vintage bus route sign would look amazing against a white, modern backdrop.
has been distributed amongst
Marinated Eggplant
And to build trust, as well. It’s a great foundation for future relationships.
from the accounts in the New Testament,
at this url for a long time.
“I’m glad we have that understanding,” was the others’ reply. “But it’s not what we know, but what we tell that matters.” His attention was focused on the wall covered in television panels showing simultaneous news reports; from pandemonium on unknown streets, to desolate farmlands, the horde was spreading across the screens. He was examining one video feed, a close up of a bunny’s tackily furred torso. It paid no mind to the camera as it fed on what remained of EM reporter DeeDee Lottagams.
I have recently heard alot about "social justice", especially in the Christian sphere. As an ignorant college student, I ran with this term without thinking about where it came from and the implications of it. I thought it was just the overarching term to use for things that the church should be doing: helping the poor, feeding the hungry, etc.
Satay variants and outlets of note
This is part of the Buzz on the internet, “According to Atkinson, Marian Robinson became increasingly frustrated as her husband, Fraser Robinson, was hobbled by multiple sclerosis in the late 1980s, and turned to “Santeria in a desperate hope” to cure him. “Michelle put her foot down when she heard that her mother took her dad to ceremonies where they did spells and trances, and sacrificed animals, chickens and goats I think. But Marian was desperate and kept going anyway, even when her husband was to sick to go with her.”[96]
While Edie's lovers ran the gambit (including Mr Bob Dylan), if this were a real engagement session, I'd have my fiance in a slim fit, tailored dark suit with a white shirt and dark tie like the look included in my inspiration board. We'd be at a chic retro bar, martinis in hand, enjoying some live music in the background. Dare to dream :) "
So when I see a factory destroyed… and see reports of depleted uranium being exploded into vaporized clouds … and then see the news “fall off the map”… that raises my suspicions.
The story dragged a little at times for me, but the descriptions are good and Deaver moves the story without a lot of extra unnecessary words. It isn’t one of my favourite reads, but I certainly can see that someone who likes this kind of crime thriller would enjoy the story a lot more than I did.
“Aaarrgggh. Help.” Sobbing uncontrollably Maude stammered, “We’re all going to die. We’re all going to die. There’ll be no more suppers for the people of Britain.” A wild-eyed Maude stared directly at television cameras and yelled, “Save yourselves. Run while there is still time. Make for the hills. Then you can freewheel back down when the petrol tuns out. Fill up jerry cans. The jerries you see. They don’t like it up ‘em Captain Mainwaring. They don’t like it up ‘em.” Regaining a semblance of control Maude said, “Go out. Buy a jerry can if you don’t have one. Fill it. And take a bucket. And a basin. And cups. And a flask. And any empty washing up liquid bottles. And pasties. Take your hot pasties, scoop out the filling and fill them up. Lovely hot VATable pasties. Yum yum. Take everything. Take them now. You must. Your future, and your children’s future depends on it. Run. Run like the wind. Make your way to the forecourts making sure your engine is switched on all the time to ensure there is space for the new petrol you’re buying. Aarrgh. We’re all going to die.”
a good reminder
1 tablespoon peanut butter (creamy or chunky)
Strength: With nine guys playing double-digit minutes, New Mexico is one of the deepest teams in college basketball. Coach Steve Alford is not afraid of playing different lineups. While only three players are averaging double-figures, seven guys are scoring at least six points per game. That’s a lot of production from a lot of different guys making the Lobos almost as dangerous when they go to their bench as when they’re playing their starters.
However, Cartwright also has a hidden past that one day bursts onto the front page of a tabloid newspaper with the display of his nude photograph. Moreover, the inside story alleges that he was once a high-end, male prostitute with a male lover—a hulking and psychopathically obsessive killer—who has recently been declared murdered when a body is found in his burned-out apartment.
4. Plenty of Fresh Clean Water
civilized
baby jake wanted a toy for his car seat.
Take, for example, the recent experience of Santa Monica Community College (CA) in establishing, and then rescinding a two-tier tuition plan.
It was the third game of the opening round of the Stanley Cup playoffs, the Chicago Blackhawks and Phoenix Coyotes, 2012. Raffi Torres of the Coyotes crashes into the Blackhawks’ Marian Hossa.
The other day I stumbled on the most fantastic Cranberry Bread recipe along with that came a tone of ambition, because I ended up making 3 different quick breads to use for breakfast this morning. I used the recipe from Cookin' Cowgirl and her recipe is amazing. The bread is perfect and delicious. Crunchy streusel topping, tart cranberries, and the sweet smell of oranges all wrapped into one delicious bread. As a matter of fact, I loved this recipe so much, I altered nothing. This is one of those recipes I plan to make over and over again in the future. Hubby loved the bread too. Neither one of the kids would try it, they have no idea what they're missing out on.
military officials.
Hahaaaaaaaaa oooooooooooooooooh.
Esther always replied, "I know Morris, but that helicopter ride is fifty dollars, and fifty dollars is fifty dollars."
Last year, I received the following query. I'm sharing it here because I think it's pretty damn good. In fact, it was so good, I used 90% of it as my pitch letter to editors and ended up selling the book in (agent brag!) record time at auction last week. So, here it is:
Words fail me.
When he died, my sisters and I were to go through his house alone and pick whatever we wanted. We had passed through his empty, cold kitchen (checked the fridge for beer, and sure enough–no food either) and through a yellow blanketed door, the blanket that used to close in his side of the bedroom at the old farmhouse when we were little toddlers, and into his room. A bare mattress, like before. I remember thinking of the time I broke into his house when I was in my teens, because I was angry, because my stepfather was watching me shower and because I had recurring memories of molestation from the early early years. I was angry. Angry because he left us. Because he left us defenseless to him. Because he was a serious alcoholic. Because he had been so scared and shy and gentle when we were so little. We got what we wanted, he shushed us, he was too embarrassed to help us in the bath–Grandma Helen had to wash us. Because when he tried to quit drinking in order to have visiting rights, he showed up at our house in tears because he couldn’t, and because he wanted us. Our parents were at the door talking to him and my sisters huddled in the kitchen, listening and crying and looking at each other. We weren’t thinking ‘he couldn’t do it’, we were thinking ‘he still wants us…someone truly wants us–they’re crying for us.’ When he went away, rejected, we went up to our rooms in the creaky house, and sat by ourselves. I wasn’t surprised that he couldn’t stop, my mother had told us how it was a disease. I was surprised that after these ten years, he still wanted us–enough so that he cried. And as we went through his messy room, we bee-lined it for his closet and each took out a shirt, smelled it, and sobbed. It was hardest for Nikki, my older sister. I’d never seen her like that before–in shock. Her daddy (she was his favorite; actually for awhile he denied Jodie and I were his, he’d carry her when she was two to the old bonneville and make me crawl in the dirt across the driveway, my mother yelling at him from the porch). Her daddy she couldn’t save was gone.
Genius is a not a thing in itself. It is merely a qualitative judgment made by individuals and critics – usually after the artist is dead!
If you like my little creations that I post from time to time,
A few weeks ago we talked about change management (Do You Resist Change?) and how people needed control in order to stop resisting the change. In a famous experiment where people were either given a lottery number or given the opportunity to choose their own lottery number it was determined that the value of choosing their own number was in fact 5 times more. Once again giving people control but this time putting a value on it. The conclusion from the study was: When we choose for ourselves, we are far more committed to the outcome – by a factor of five to one.
already insinuated into every gesture,
Birds · · · birds are freedom eternally.
and my mind brings me back to childhood.
Price: $15
Have been identified many substances inhibiting cancer. These substances, which belong to twenty different classes of organic compounds, have the potential ability to prevent various cancers.
Errr. What eyeshadow? (I hate you Rudeboy. Was that really necessary?)
weaves and dives
This can be used to stay on top of virtually any topic. You can also select the source of information under “Advanced Search.” The International Herald Tribune is one of the better sources.
I've been encountering a new class of assholes around the island as of late, and for once it has nothing to do with that asshole who sits next to me in class. No, this is a whole new type of asshat. These a groups of people who feel that they're only mission in life is to find some way to make their lives sound superior to others, whether it is true or only true in their heads. It is so funny and sad at the same time.
We will look at the story of Abraham and Isaac to understand more about the covenants that God had with His people. We will also take a look at this interesting video that gives an interesting overview of the Old Testament structure.
In the same year, withdrawals and payments of more than R3m were made from the trust. Two recipients of money from Malema’s trust were Gucci clothing and the five-star Twelve Apostles hotel in Cape Town.
Her face scrunched up. "Still the one with the pee baby?" I'd read a passage to her during last week's coffee date -- a most stunning description of a baby covered in her own urine: "a little white sardine still fragrant with briny pee."
None of the politicians that were out in full force last night could be found around today’s carnival, which probably saw less than 300 people early afternoon.
to give the effect of a massive flag,
They are full of all my favorites: Butter, pecans, peanut butter, chocolate chips, oats...Just a whole buncha good in one hand. And they are big cookies. In my house, everything is big: big shoes, big babies, big chairs and big cookies.
Biweekly, a big rig from Ontario would arrive at our rural Nova Scotia home to unload the next shipment. There was always lots of excitement in our house the day the truck was coming! (It may even have influenced the course of my brother’s life who is now an Operations Manager for a large trucking firm in British Columbia…)
For now, I have to assume that God has equipped me for this. Hands on training I guess. Years and years of hands on training.
Our authorizations to work in the hospital finally came, which meant we were actually able to use our nursing skills. We worked 2 days and then we had to leave for an AIM (Africa Inland Mission) conference. It was fun trying to figure out what was going on with the patients although most of the don't speak English! Thank God for the other nurses and nursing students who were available to translate. I started an IV on a woman who had tiny veins. It was pretty exciting to get it in the first try seeing I haven't started an IV in over 2 years!
Anyone interested in a free copy, here you go. And yes, YOU ARE WELCOME.
And a she-wolf, that with all hungerings
it calls to me unbidden
Feminine or masculine – that is how you are strong. There is no miracle cure, no endgame where you finally have strength. You are just grounded in who you are and, as a result, nothing can shake or deter you. But, I think most people are afraid to do so because they either don’t know how to open up to the people in life that matter most (family) or they don’t want to see what is behind the facade. I say facade because people can appear strong on the surface, but in fact are weak and plagued with insecurities. Men or women. Sometimes the ‘b*ch’ women that seem to have it together are the ones clinging the most desperately for approval from others. Sometimes the ‘tough’ men that look like they could beat anyone up are the ones most afraid of being hurt.
3 Ounces Honey
This farmer told the newspaper he had told the new owners on a number of occasions that he would be prepared to give water to the cattle if they would place a drinking trough on their side of the fence. The new owners said this wouldn’t work because the animals would have to walk through a vlei to get there, and if it rained, they would get wet! They actually found an excuse not to take up this offer! Many people in the area phoned the SPCA: they were sick to the stomach at the way the new owners treated the animals. The SPCA warned the owners that water must be supplied and gave them a date on which they must react to the warning. The owners did nothing and now the SPCA must obtain a court order against these people. At the time of going to press, the newspaper wasn’t sure whether the court order had been granted.
But they didn’t take long to form the “V” and fly over us. What a beautiful day out of doors! These geese though… I surely miss them and their sounds when we were gone last fall. Welcome back!
We went to see The Muppets at the cinema. Ran into my sister, nieces, friends and their kids. I think the adults enjoyed the movie more than the kids. Some very funny bits.
glass votive when burning candles in this holder. You can use these outside
'I now wear it around my neck - which is better than where it was. I decided to put it on a chain because it has already been with me for all these years.'
On Saturday night, we attended a Spring Fling BBQ at our church. It was a lot of fun-- good food and fellowship with friends. :-) During the day, Kiddo #4 helped her grandmother make baked eggplant.
And stuff,
We make our way to the Cafe Majestic right at the Dam Square and I order the English Breakfast and the Moreeke Beer (brewed by Beer Brewery de Koningshoeven the only Trappist Brewery in the Netherlands).
Nettle patch near a young apple tree in a grove is quite a good placement - the plant seems to stay away from the root zone of the fruit tree where picking up fallen apples would be less than pleasant with such groundcover - but it grows happily nearby. Such food forest design works well for both plants - and it also works well with more complex guilds of farm animals - goats stay away from it, so do the chickens, but earth worms thrive in its protection!
Twenty years later Daniel is a missionary in Ecuador. He blogs about spreading God's word and about his 5 children who are all learning the missionary work now, so they will forever live the life "God has planned for them". He is about to start a new community that will allow him and his workers and volunteers to reach even more villages in the jungle. Daniel goes against anything I stand for. He spreads his belief to those who don't want it, who don't need it... but they are poor, and he can help them, and so they convert to his religion.
Ribbon and buttons are from stash.
With no one to bare, no one to pledge
Only now, when Congress has once again used TV spectrum auctions as an excuse to spend more money than it has, does it bring up the issue of receiver performance. In a wee section of the Seriously Misnomered Act of 2012, Congress directs the Comptroller General to conduct a study on transmission systems that includes “improving receiver performance as it relates to increasing spectral efficiency.”
As a note, I did cook it and then remove some for son to eat WITHOUT oyster sauce as he is allergic. His tasted significantly different without the addition of the oyster sauce but delicious nonetheless.
When I turned in on and pointed it at my knee... OHNOES! It must be defective. It's all blurry and junk! Wait... to the internet! Nope, according to the FAQ, it's blurry because I am looking at the reticle, and not a target in the near or far distance. My knee is too near. Point it at the van down the street and... perfect. No point it at the van down the street BEFORE you mount it on your rifle, dummy. Oh jeez.
“It is common among many of us when we become more aware of what is involved in following Jesus and the urgencies that this involves, especially when we find ourselves in Samaritan territory, that we become more intense about our language. Because it is so much more clear and focused we use the language learned from sermons and teachings to tell others what is eternally important. But the very intensity of the language can very well reduce our attentiveness to the people whom we are speaking—he or she is no longer a person, but a cause. Impatient to get our message out, we depersonalize what we have to say into rote phrases or programmatic formula without regard to the person we are meeting. As the urgency to speak God’s word increases, listening relationships diminish. We end up with a bone pile of fleshless words—godtalk” (21).
- Splash of Cider Vinegar
At 7:00 I will read a book to the boys and at 7:30 we have scripture reading and prayer as a family. The boys go to bed at 8:00.
We can’t expect nations to be at peace until we as individuals live at peace with each other. All of the attempts that are being made for peace on the national and international level; but if we are to have peace, we must start down on the level of the individual.
This is a great quote from Dalai Lama XIV
So, um, if anyone has any advice or suggestions for any of this part of the trip, please do let me know. We might need them!
I have like a ton of stuff I need to purge....my little brother, (just 18) is getting married, May 1st and while he's in basic training, my Dad, my Sister and I are planning the wedding. Why us instead of the bride and her family? Because baby bro decided and ANNOUNCED right before we shipped him off to boot camp, that HE would be paying for the whole wedding. Yep, you got it, he buried himself(and us). It's not really a big deal, but navigating the family dynamic mine field is something I'm not fond of, nor am I good at.
_____Lost my friend in the airport today, so I quickly took my phone logged on to Facebook and went to Find Friend...............thanks for nothing Mark! (funny Mark Zukerberg status joke)
I had all but a fiver to my name but still decided to take the bus into town so's to save my legs. Another reason for doing this was because the last time I were standing at my local stop a woman got off and gimmie her all-day ticket. This happened twice. Twice in a row. At this I felt very blessed. So much so that a kind of idolatry took hold, a holyman's convince-ment that this would happen a third time – and ascribed to this believe the classical holy trinity.
Friend: "Was he a tax accountant?"
The book also pays tribute to the roles that friends play in our lives. Through an array of characters Winman deftly shows the effect friends and friendships can have upon our lives, whether positive or otherwise. Some friends carry more weight than others, where certain characters are concerned, from the moment they appear on the page it becomes clear that they will have a lasting effect on the story and its characters.
who shall for the sake of those he loves
In the recent past, people throughout the Middle East forced out Tunisia’s despot, killed Libya’s despot, removed Egypt’s Hosni Mubarak from office, and are fighting and dying to get rid of Syria’s despot, Bashar Assad. Both Yemen and Somalia are basket cases with tribal warfare the order of the day. Even the Iranians have demonstrated their unhappiness, taking away Amadinejad’s majority in their parliament. He recently abandoned his usual bellicose talk of wiping Israel off the map.
-Fighting for what I know in my heart is right.
variations on the shapes.
Take a cruise around the city; the streets are full of contrast. You will find bullock carts stuck in traffic jams along with BMW and Mercedes cars, a slum on one side and a top notch shopping mall on the other and of course those Indian cars like Maruti 800 with BMW and Ferrari logo. Seriously it’s very tough to get bored in Delhi.
The System: This is a hard one. Ever since I finished Brutal Legend I've been trying to decide on the right system to run it for the inevitable tabletop game. This is one system where PDQ seems too light for me. Oddly one of the best options I've found is 4th edition D&D...just reskin the mystical classes (warlock=guitarist, cleric=singer, wizard=stage effects) and you're pretty good to go. However, I think Savage Worlds probably falls into the "just right" range for me. And it doesn't get much more Savage than the world of Metal.
According to your faith and acceptance of The Truth…
I'm having a hard enough time getting X threw high school as it is and to have constant unschooling quotes (about the "horrors" of the school system) fed to him on facebook doesn't help. I do not have someone else to support me while I school him myself. I have gotten him into classes to make it easier for him (smaller class sizes and more chances to get ahead), but he doesn't even try at all in some classes. I know the high school system is not perfect in any way, but I expect my son to put forth some kind of effort...at least try. I am in no way putting the blame for his apathy in school on you. I just saying the constant
Just when you think I am going to have to go and either close this blog down for good - or at least rename it more appropriately - I go and get working on another toneybaby.
In the last six months, FAO, the UN Children’s Fund (UNICEF), the World Food Programme (WFP) and international non-governmental organizations (NGOs) have also operated cash-for-work and food-voucher programmes, instead of relying only on food and input handouts.
How stupid do you think The American People are?
Anyway, I now have a rough idea of a route that will be more than manageable in a week. The diversions are where the real fun will lie, though…
There were three suggestions for finishing the seams: 1) serge (which I did), 2) trim with pinking shears (which I seriously considered) and 3) finish the seams with binding (which I eventually want to get into the habit of doing).﻿
Dave Gibson (Ind) 347
That being said, I also think the .22 caliber rifle is the rifle of choice for a survival situation, be it natural disaster, apocalypse, or even Zombie Apocalypse. The following are my top three choices for the .22 Rifle you should own for any situation.
By the end of the book I was wondering, what was the point of all that? The characters themselves don’t understand why they were put through the horrors they were and one can only hope this is because the author will develop the story I the next two books. The reason I liked this book was because the suspense kept me intrigued. I just had to know why the boys were in the maze and how they were going to escape. I just with it had been more thought provoking and detailed.
“And I will pour upon the house of David, and upon the inhabitants of Jerusalem, the spirit of grace and of supplications; and they shall look upon me whom they have pierced, and they shall mourn for him, as one mourneth for his only son, and shall be in bitterness for him, as one that is in bitterness for his firstborn.”
Your watch may be in perfect shape, but the band has become worn… did you know that you could easily change it out? Most luxury watches allow for you to replace or exchange the band.
Approximate retail value of the each entire Trip package: $1,600.00 (approximate retail value of all prizes awarded $3,200.00).
My grandma brought over a couple of my great-grandpa Jenne's old hats and Drew and Brian got to try them on. Drew was going for a french look and ended up looking really crazy and Brian was going for an angry Russian look.
It's been over 2 months aback the endure column on this blog, and I feel bad. Not because we accept an ardent readership (HI DARREN!) or because we've been too alive for fun or annihilation rational like that. I feel bad because we've abandoned a living, breath commodity of internets.
As we closed in on the coast in front of Perpignan, the profile flattened. We were in a small gap between the Mediteranean and the Pyrenean mountain chain which was off to our left and still covered in snow. It is 23′c and we are on a series of bike paths that run by the side of the road. How good is this? Coffee may have risen by a quantum margin again, but France is good.
Lovely stuff…
and he will sustain you;
Have a wonderful Friday everyone
You cannot harm me
The last time my husband, Kevin saw his grandmother was on a European tour in 1986. I never had the pleasure of meeting Wera, but I know from the many kind cards we received over the 16 years of our marriage that she was a lovely lady.
The Emmaus story challenges us to see that it isn’t our unshakable faith and deep spirituality that connect us with the risen Christ, but our smallest gestures of hospitality and friendship.
Once I asked L to touch herself while I watched. As if to provide cover for both of us, I added, “I want to know what you like.” As if I was looking for a tutorial, as if I didn’t know how much I was asking.
PETALING JAYA: The inquest into the death of Teoh Beng Hock will be held from July 29 till Aug 12.
1-cup red lentils, rinsed and drained
- Squats (15)
There is a new sketch each Wednesday to be completed by the following Monday and if you do all 10 there is a fantastic grand prize!
22And the LORD shewed signs and wonders, great and sore, upon Egypt, upon Pharaoh, and upon all his household, before our eyes:
4. Playing in miles of bubbles that mysteriously made their way into so many fountains courtesy of the Bubble Bandit Brigade.
I won't go through all the details of what led up to it. I had just talked to him in the kitchen and in the matter of one minute...
Fragrance in the front yard with Admiral Semmes. Fragrance in the backyard with Fothergilla 'Mt. Airy'. If you don't have Fothergilla in your garden, you are missing out. This honey scented bloom is outstanding in the spring and the fall color is out of this world.
I can't wait to see how this goes!
(Italian) See you soon,
I particularly enjoyed the current Herbs Ritts exhibition (I will write a full post about it later).
For a lot of writers, this is a major source of anxiety. For as long as you can remember, your book has been your own. The only people who’ve read it have been people on your side: writer colleagues in your critique group, your friends, your spouse, your kids, your agent, your editor. People who want to like your book because they like you, or because they believe strongly in the book and its potential contribution to children’s literature.
Halle Berry instantly gave me a bad feel. I don’t dislike her, she just has an aura. That aura does not include shark wrangler. It just doesn’t. Or shark whisperer even. The whisperer part, sure.
You’ve grown up so much this year. You’re a huge help with your little brother, though sometimes I have to remind you that you’re not his parent. You told me it was okay when I cried in pain. You got your first pet, your fish Ocean, bringing him home from a family wedding. You started having homework, and do it so capably and responsibly, which I hope will continue throughout your life. Your have become a very competent reader, noticing words you never bothered to acknowledge before and reading them triumphantly. You’ve dealt with a schoolmate who wasn’t treating you kindly in a really wonderful way, so that now you’re getting along much better. You have many friends, and adults adore you.
2) Scroll down to the bottom of the page to find the box, and type in what you have to say.
Two to each keyboard, she gave each pair a sheet of music and let them work out the base* line, then the chords (clapping in the recording) and when they'd mastered those, the melody. Only a couple of them managed to play the base* line with the melody, it was quite tricky for them. They did enjoy it though and I helped several with the notes and the rhythm. There are some quite exuberant lads in that class, which I always enjoy (don't you find the rascals are much more fun?) and they worked hard and really concentrated and were pleased to play to the rest of the class at the end and be applauded.
Hearts starve as well as bodies:
Issue #3: Clothing
See you Monday, Lord willing!
We imagine the Hail To eventually having potential for virality akin to the Twitter #, and the relevancy of a LinkedIn recommendation. We’d like to make it a tool for recognizing Good, and for now, you can get your name up there as one of the first ‘Hailed To’ just by donating to our Kickstarter project!
What does hockey have to do with cheese? Let me explain.
Contrary to the square face, rectangular faces tend to be longer than they are wide, but still possess some of the angular features, found in the square faces as well. A curvy frame will take away some of the harshness traditionally found in angular traits and give the illusion of a longer face. In this particular face we recommend the tried and true aviator frames as they give a nice balance in this situation.
"After Mars there follows a space of 4+24=28 parts, in which no planet has yet been seen. Can one believe that the Founder of the universe had left this space empty? Certainly not."The stage was further set by Herschel, who had discovered the planet Uranus in 1781. After his discovery, astronomers had warmed to the idea of finding new planets telescopically...it was new, it was happening, it was the in thing to do. Moreover, Uranus fits perfectly as the next term of the Titius-Bode equation. A coordinated observing campaign was begun to search for the missing planet.
Pectin Fiber, helps control hunger.
prensalatina
Since he is such a great orator, why doesn't anyone in Obama's college class remember him? And, why won't he allow Columbia to release his records? Do you like millions of others, simply assume all this is explainable - even though no one can?
3. "The Boston Rag" – 5:40
And coffee, all in one
Found in certain fruits and vegetables as well as egg yolks, lutein is a nutrient with a number of potentially beneficial effects. It is a member of the carotenoid family, a group of chemicals related to vitamin A.
Non-dairy buttermilk: Vegan or non-dairy buttermilks can be made by adding 1 T of lemon juice or a mild-flavored vinegar to 1 c of faux milk. In recipes for dressings or casseroles where the thicker creaminess matters, you may find it easier to substitute a plain unflavored vegan yogurt made from soy, coconut, nut, or other milk. Buttermilk starters could also be added to your favorite milk, but success could be pretty variable depending on whether your milk contains enough of the correct types of sugars to support the culture. The fat content of the milk will depend on what you started with, and it does not contain probiotics.
Hackins Hey, for example, was a quaint by-way in Liverpool with small shops dating from the 18th century. But to planners and councillors it was only history and so it was destroyed overtime for a railway station that was not built. What little remains of Liverpool’s unique character and community spirit is still under threat. In 2005, the government issued a directive to destroy 20,000 habitable homes in Liverpool (and thousands more elsewhere), to be replaced by largely executive-style homes beyond the economic reach of dispossessed locals. Whole Liverpool neighbourhoods are still being flattened and their often unwilling communities compulsorily dispersed.
Next time life throws you to the ground, stay down there and find that lost contact you’ve been missing. Say it with me, “Failure is my friend”
A meeting held by Mosh Zu gives all those a choice at the Sanctuary stay and live by the rules or go. Sidorio is in the crowd! What?? How did he get there? He offers them another option, life on the prison ship. About 1/3 of the people go.
Outside the window there are soldiers,
Sentiments: Just Rite Stamps (front) & Stampin' Up (inside)
Roasted Brussel Sprouts
Small piece of plastic canvas, about 3" circle
So outside he went to take a nap upon a bed of shamrocks.
I brought that back up. I felt a kind of urgency in trying to convey to him once again how desperate I feel for some help at home. Telling him how dd to me is mostly a tool. He likes tools. How if he uses it as a tool to help me suddenly I feel as if I have a purpose. When I feel I have a purpose for doing the circular chores (you know the ones that have to be done over and over and you start to wonder WHY? or WHY ME?) everything else sort of comes into light. Things have meaning and life can happily go on.
Thank you for Letizia Mancino's article. I enjoyed it very much.
Go back over the basics: theme, plot, setting, characters, dialog, point-of-view, style. What logic points have you missed? A spell checker catches most things. This add on works as well for catching some grammar mistakes – After the Deadline
I'm talking about having lots of kids if they come to you, sending them to college, feeding your ice cream habit, and in general living with what some would consider some sort of crazy risk-taking -- but, once you get used to it, just seems normal and actually gratitude-inducing for how much plenty we encounter all around us!
(repeated)
The reason this is such a big difference is because of rounding the number of hit dice turned. In Moldvay, round down: "he rolls agains to see how many monsters he turns. The result of 9 means that 4 ghouls (a total of 8 hit dice worth) are turned away (extra hit dice have no effect)." In the "black book" on the other hand, round up: the DM "divides the number rolled by the number of Hit Dice each monster has (round leftovers up). The result is how many undead monsters the cleric turned." In Holmes and 1e, the roll is not for the number of hit dice turned but the number of undead and so rounding is not an issue.
Big aromatic mix of citrus NZ/US hops on the smell very inviting along with some sweet maltiness that reminded me of some of the United States brewer SOUTHERN TIER imperial range of beers.
Brodie bit back angry words as he crossed to the wood stove in the far corner of the designated living room. Long ago he'd taught her with his fists not to question him. That life seemed so long ago to him. He hadn't hit her in months, hadn't even cussed her or raised his voice. Something had changed within him after secluding them in these woods; and now he couldn't believe he'd ever been that angry, hateful man. He hoped she'd forget in time.
Much of the week will have a suspended in air feel, as if time has momentarily stopped. Mercury, the planet that rules communication and travel flow, is stationing direct on Monday, and will not move noticeably until next week. By the week, Mars will ease into the degree where he will turn direct next week.
Nevertheless, many who exercise in political punditry, that’s all of us by the way, are suggesting that all the flag-waving, parades and fireworks come Aug 31 are part of an elaborate strategy on the part of the incumbent government taking us on a feel-good ride all the way to a general election, soon. Perhaps.
My compañera (the one who accompanies me in this path) has more than just a sense of the music playing as we dance, but perhaps even a sense of the the music of the universe (musica universalis). Maybe her vision and fine-tuned intuition pulls me into new dimensions of musicality. Maybe the music so fully guides us both that our musical auras intertwine and take us both to a place that we may naively believe to because of the other, but it was really a higher sense. Maybe we have our own musical combined musical tones or phrase, and when combined with each they create a completeness and a wonderful harmony. At the end of such a dance, she might say, "You are such a good lead." But it really was her; it was us. When I tell her that I cannot take the credit, she discounts my statement as false humility. But it is true.
Oh do you know Hello Kitty?Hello kitty is kind of ”Japanesecat” and kitty made in Japan!!
It is clear to see that the Torah represented not just legalities but the entire Judaist faith, and its significance cannot be underestimated; the prosperity of ancient Israel seems to wax and wane with how high regard the Torah was held. Jehoshaphat’s plan of restoringIsraelafter Asa’s failing reign was to instructIsraelin these matters:
10. Summoning the Ancient Ones
Where To Change Money:
my heart
“Sure, sure,” he answered with a wave of his hand. He had found a rolling pin under the kitchen counter and was staring at it like he’d never seen one before. Momentarily, Moody thought about ordering pizza and having it delivered.
It starts out with a young woman in a burnt-out grocery store, picking through the ruins for whatever may be left to scrounge. She has some reason to believe that it’s worth trying. She’s cold and desperate mostly. And she does find a couple things. For her baby. Which it turns out, is hidden inside her greatcoat. Jeannie and Sophie. Sophie’s the baby.
Labuschagne also used the opportunity to deny that the Minister would have to return the liver she received in a 2007 transplant. She attacked the "general belief" that Tshabalala-Msimang "only got the liver because she was Health Minister at the time, and that she pulled rank to jump the queue".
OK, so. Tea runs in 2-hour shifts. You have to book ahead, and some time slots are booked months in advance. We did 7-9 pm on a Friday (not many people want tea when it’s supper time). There is a dress code for the men; I suppose they figure us girls know how to dress ourselves! J was suited & booted and looked fab. His sister and I got dolled up in frocks, nice shoes, etc. I even wore a flower fascinator! It lasted about halfway through the meal because it gives me a headache.
"I can choose to work or quit, and, man, working's a drag." Really? Have you seen this economy, Jeep Voiceover Man? Because if you aren't gratefully on your knees in front of your boss every day, thanking him or her for keeping you in a job stable enough to allow you to afford a new Jeep in the first place, there's about 500 people behind you ready to drop-n-gobble for the privilege. Whiny little shithead.
So I went in to the audition…didn’t understand where to stand or move, or how to work with the cameras (except in theory), or any of those basics. I didn’t have a full understanding of the character, or what this particular director wanted to bring out in the character, because all I had was knowledge I’d gleaned from the accounts of others, and what I’d come up with in my own head (which was perhaps a good beginning…but really wasn’t worthy yet of public notice.) And so I completed my audition – only to lose out to a more seasoned actress. And not because I didn’t have what it took; that’s the sad thing. I lost out because that open audition made it too easy to jump in and tell myself I was capable and professional, when really, what I was was completely and utterly green…and it showed.
Patterned: Honestly no idea
-Amber Rae
can't get to the computer at work right now so decided to rattle off a few tired old phrases, just for shits and giggles.
It was “the” heavy metal booth at the festival. They would have welcomed me with open arms, except I wasn’t wearing my Motorhead shirt today. (The temperature was to cold). Doh! I’m here for ya Wingnutz! I should be on that team!
For a while, it was as close to perfection as we imagined, and then Bryan got in a car accident and all that changed.
And in a large part because of this blog, my writing is getting better (at least that’s what I like to think!) Over the last year I’ve experimented with a bunch of new techniques and styles, from comedy in The Yellow Brick Road to gothic suspense in The Bloody Chamber. I had fun speculating on canon scenes in What Sarah Said and Dead in the Woods. I even got to make Federico García Lorca a vampire in Death in Disguise and have Pam and Sookie come visit me in my Home Sweet Home story The Fog. I’m still surprised by how popular the extra True Blood scene The Kiss has been. I’d do each one of these stories a little differently now, but they were all a ton of fun and great writing experience in one way or another.
In a similar vein, Elisha Cook’s character is unpleasant enough to detract, alternately drunk and superstitious. On the other hand, Julie Mitchum is given almost nothing to do but exist. The plot has, apparently, no proper use for her.
I do wish to be back here more again, but please know in the meantime I am just off in a quiet place.
The thrill of the race still holds me. The energy from engaging in this sport with great people in a meaningful way is something I still find captivating. The feeling of a boat going fast and the sense of timing and ease of movement within the crew is incredibly and tantalizingly satisfying. These things I enjoy and look forward to. These things I will miss when I eventually stop rowing. Creating and working together towards a pure team performance is very cool and I love the sensation of crafting it and shaping it into something so repeatable and well understood within that it becomes a bond, a fuel source and a reason to dig deep. There are other things less enjoyable and these do rub and frustrate at times.
I needed the shelter of someone's arms
Suddenly there was a heavy gust of wind. The wind was building force by the minute. Harvi lost consciousness as he found himself seized by the eye of a tornado. He did not know how many hours had passed before he regained consciousness. He opened his eyes. What a crazy dream it had been! It was still dark. Maybe time to quickly study something for the exams.
But I keep getting swamped with the feeling of “so what?” over what I’m writing. Why would anyone be interested in what I have to say about this or that? Just because I did something or spoke to someone, doesn’t automatically make it an interesting read for anyone else.
If you'd like to book on this class, it will be taking place on Saturday, 24 March at Beauchief Baptist Church, Hutcliffe Wood Road, Sheffield. All details can be found at my website HERE.
Besides, there’s always Old Village. It has jewelry stores, restaurants, clothing boutiques, salons, bars, etc. Old Village, in my view, never gets enough promotion by the City. If some of the traffic moves over there for a few days, I’m sure the folks in the redheaded stepchild part of town would be thankful.
They also offer all manner of fun stuff for guys...
Stamps: Nutcrafters: Birthday Girl Aster
So they were all pissed that they must stand heaven forbid. They drank for free for an hour and tipped us maybe a combined total of $6 and that is pushing it. I wish I could say I was kidding but sadly I am not. Most of them were very nice and all it just sucks when you work for free! So they made us shut down the music so they could give their toasts, and there were I think a grand total of 7 and they all basically sucked. The funniest came from Old School, where they talked about the gang bang! So the party ended quickly and everyone was mad they didn't drink for free anymore, however they stayed through out the whole night. Some of them left and some of them started new tabs with me.
I got to Robin's house around 4:30. We sat and talked until about 5, when Christi got there. Then we set up and got to work! Christi and I were re-skeining while Robin hanked and tagged each skein. Then later in the evening Miki and Rebecca showed up (with dinner..YAY!) and we took a break to eat. After dinner, we split off into teams of two, where one of us would get one skein ready while the other would re-wind the ones on the swifts, and finally Robin would then hank and tag them. It worked brilliantly and before we knew it, we had re-skeined 45! Amazing, right? We ended the night around 11pm, so a little earlier than last time but not much! I got home around 11:30, leaving everything in the car to be unpacked the next day as I was exhausted.
A new comment on the post “Is she hot?” is waiting for your approval
His eldest son (my cousin) was tasked with the responsibility of managing the farm, but the young chap, who had just arrived from a 2-year stint on the border, fighting black terrorists and other Marxist-Communists, took the stance of zero tolerance when it came to squatters, thieves, and lazy people.
Touch Me In The Morning - John Holt (Diana Ross)
The photo above was taken after I pruned the plants back. I took 2 totes of leaves out of the greenhouse! The vining tomatoes I chopped half of the bottom 2 or 3 leaves off and I did a lot of thinning in my bush varieties - airflow and light into the middle is my goal....Can you see a difference between the photo above and the first photo of the post?
She took a big downturn this weekend, while I was gone. The Man said that she had more or less stopped eating and drinking. I filled her amoxicillin and prednisone prescription when I got back, and started trying to force-hydrate her with syringes full of water (and bits of food,) but she wasn't really responsive. (She was still pissed, though, and though she was very weak, I still got a few swipes at my hand for my trouble.)
I have had so much fun with this blog hop and I can not wait for the next one.
Three high school students, including one juvenile, and an adult were arrested and booked into the Rains County jail. The two males and two females will be charged with three counts each of capital murder, Traylor said.
“So, Vickie, what is the moral of The Boy Who Cried Wolf?” She was like a damn teacher. All she needed was a ruler to crack me across my knuckles.
Oh the things that are running through my brain right now! Today I had to fight to live in reality. I don’t like living in this small town. I am the type of person who needs to have something to do every minute or my mind wanders and I either think of the future and plan or I start thinking about the past. Today I was thinking about the past. It’s stupid thinking about the past because it has already happened and there is nothing you can do about it but I did. I was thinking about the things that I should have done different and was wondering about what would happen if I made a different choice. Why?! There is no point. I can’t change it! Everytime I started wandering I tried playing with the baby loves or just singing. I am going to keep living in the now.
The Fine Print of Self-Publishing is in its 4th edition. In addition to The Fine Print, Mark has published scholarly works and two novels, Saturn Return.
Musée des Arts Decoratif
I then cooked it in a 325 degree oven for about 4 hours ( in a covered roasting pan). Brian put it on the Weber over indirect heat and smoked it for an hour (because we ran out of time - it could have even gone longer). When it was cool enough to handle, I tore it off the bone & shredded the meat with forks. Put it in a baking dish and pour over your favorite sauce. Since I am from KC, MO - I like the 3 Pigs sauce that is made there. The meat soaks up the sauce. If you are ready to eat, go for it, or you can hold it in the oven until ready. Trust me - it was all gone by the end of the day (well, we did have company).
Our moving date has been put back a month because one of the links in the chain is having a struggle to get everything done in time. It’s been a very long since we moved house and the last time we did it, we bought a piece of land and built our own, which means I had completely forgotten the frustrations. How slow it is.
New Music Everywhere (NEW MUSE) is Madison’s only professional music ensemble specializing in the performance of new works in unconventional venues. Jerry Hui, Jonathan Kuuskoski and Paola Savvidou (below) formed the ensemble in August 2010 through generous support from the College Music Society Yamaha In-Residence Fellowship and the Dane County Cultural Affairs Commission. Projects thus far have taken the group to such diverse venues as museums (MMoCA, Madison Children’s Museum), public spaces (a flash mob performance at the Dane County Farmer’s Market) and nightclubs (Plan B).
But when I was going through my camera photos, I found this one from spring break and wanted to share it with you:
using said regression model to rate or rank one or more patents in a third patent population by inputting into said regression model selected patent metrics representative of or describing corresponding characteristics of said one or more patents in said third population to be rated or ranked and causing said regression model to output a corresponding rating or ranking based thereon.
Then trip over crossing the kitchen
Exactly nine years ago today, LG was learning how to trick-or-treat. At thirteen months old, candy and superheroes were his life, and a day dedicated to both were just about more than he could handle. He ran from house to house as quickly as his little legs would carry him and shouted "twickatweet" at the top of his lungs, often before he even rang the bell. Fueled by sugar and excitement, he'd have run until dawn if I'd let him. But Halloween night was unseasonably cold that year, and while I'd dressed LG and the baby as warmly as I could, I decided that half an hour was quite enough trick-or-treating for the evening.
This was a great book. I really enjoyed it, and I think it’s earned Brandon Mull a place in my list of great authors. Original plot and original world. I don’t think I’ve ever read a book with remotely the same storyline. Well, actually, Fablehaven (also Brandon Mull) was almost the opposite of this, but that’s okay with me. I liked the displacers and seed people a lot. Unfortunately, I recognized Brandon Mull’s writing through this book. Number one, he’s got a huge vocabulary that every character seems to share. Number two, characters like Ferrin. This is his trademark supporting character: a character who makes friends with the MC’s, then turns out to be evil all along. You can see it in Fablehaven too: Vanessa the blix was a character like that. Even Ferrin’s turn at the end where he tries to help Jason was like Vanessa. So yes, it reeks of Brandon Mull. Not that it was bad.
”I need to go; I have to go to the store. Give me my keys! I have to go! I have to go!”
Recently our country seems be lagging behind several other nations economically. Nations sporting highly "fettered" economies. Nations with government involvement in industrial policy. Nations with government controls absolutely antithetical to the prescripts for economic growth and widespread prosperity espoused by free market evangelists. Why would that be? How could that be? Could our laissez-faire approach to national economic policy be a factor? Even if true, where would I find someone who would concur? Someone acquainted with economics and economic policy, someone who spoke presciently about the dangers?
What is your favorite "as seen on TV" kitchen gadget?
articulate and elegant and (as he himself had said) “non-threatening,”
CHANGE YOUR ATTITUDES TOWARDS MUSLIMS AND MUSLIM WOMEN!
1/2 lb sage-flavored breakfast sausage or 3 pork sausage links, diced
My mother and I often fought. We argued about hair and make-up, the shortness of my skirts, the length and colour of my fingernails. We disagreed on most things from the boys I liked to the dreams I held dear. We saw the world through different eyes, from how safe it was, to how beautiful it is. We seldom saw the same colour. She saw blue. I saw cerulean. She saw red. I saw crimson. We seldom heard the same song. She heard a lark singing. I heard an eagle calling.
… still Your mercy remains.
Athletic Nick has been playing sports for as long as he can remember and on a variety of different levels. With a history of basketball, football, baseball and golf as well as many others Athletic Nick has always had a competitive nature. But his biggest passion as an athlete has always been baseball.
Then came the hardest part for me. Unfolding the sheets. I never did get mine to look like a circle, but then once I made the first one, I keep doing the same thing. I think if you fold half in one direction and the other half in the opposite, you will have a fuller pom pom.
CC BY-NC
Emerging
However, TOC does not seem to care a hoot about Mr Nair’s threat to sue them. When approached by inSing news, TOC said that the article was by a contributor and the views are of the contributor.
In a recent review of available controlled studies in the field of gastroenterology conducted at the University Hospital of South Manchester, West Didsbury UK, scientists discovered that t hypnotherapy is unequivocally beneficial for patients suffering from gastrointestinal disorders including irritable bowel syndrome and peptic ulceration (1).
“is there a phone I can use? El phono? Señorita? El phono por favor?!?”
** ritter=knight, their topic since restarting school this year has been knights & the middle ages, great for the boys but a bit of a yawn for the girls, I don't know who's most looking forward to the next topic (sex, or maybe it's sex education) the boys, the girls or the parents (just for the entertainment value at the dinner table of course)
Will just result in hurt and scorn
Batting: Hobbs Tuscany Collection, 100% wool batting which needs to be quilted every 3".
Saturday – Fresh Fish (I’ll pick up some fresh when I go shopping this day)
Hello May, boy did you come fast this year. Time just seems to be flying, does that meant I getting old? No, don't answer that. LOL
1 vials
“Aye. I could do that.”
Most of us, in different moments and seasons in our lives, we have thought about our Health. I have come to realize that Health is not just the good results of my annual medical checkups. Health is a much more complex subject. Health is not only physical but also emotional and spiritual. Talking about Health, we need to look at it as a package addressed to our Body, Soul and Spirit.
1) There are around 620 irregular verbs in the English language! That’s way too many for me to list here.
Sallmén M, Lindbohm ML, Kyyrönen P, Nykyri P, Anttila A, Taskinen H, Hemminski K. Reduced fertility among women exposed to organic solvents. Am J Ind Med 1995; 27: 699-713.
And, what would you put on your good excuse list?
- 1/2 cup grated coconut
Usage – Juana is just a hapless victim of riots.
There was a time where it felt like this was the only band I was listening to. As a result I don't really listen to them anymore. I've seen them live a few times and been underwhelmed, but the impact this album made on me just won't fade. I discovered them at the beginning of a short but intense friendship and I have trouble separating the two. I also remember putting "Heart Cooks Brain" on a mixtape for a boy that never reciprocated. This album carries the nostalgia of a lost of firsts and a long bout of teenage malaise.
The positive news is that being ProG positive means none of my shortcomings are my fault because I am seriously flawed and should be pitied and soothed with compassionate gifts of chocolate, rather than scorned for my lack of focus and failure to meet art and writing goals.
“How about we ride around and get to know one another?” Roger asked Marianna. Before she could even consider Roger’s proposition Isabel made her presence known. “Don’t talk to that guy. We don’t know him. Marianna get in the car!” Isabel Ivy demanded. Marianna just looked back at her. “Don’t be so up tight,” she said as she winked at her. “Where are you from?” she asked the total stranger. “I live in Cincinnati” Roger responded. “Who is that with you?” Marianna asked. “That’s my brother Randy Lee. By the way, I’m Roger Scott. Who’s is your friend?” Roger asked “That’s Isabel Ivy, and I‘m Marianna Bea”, Marianna replied. “Isabel Ivy Johnston meet Roger Scott…..?” Marianna stopped from lack of knowledge.”Our last name is Ryan”, Roger added.
NUS has also clarified that Sun Xu is not on any internship at the moment. It is not known if Schlumberger terminated Sun’s visits after receiving numerous complaints from netizens about him.
Don't look at me !
But I was able to use turmeric in a few of my most recent facials and have been truly pleased with the results.
H - We’ll see, we’ll see. In this week's post, I want to wrap up a few themes that have been developing here on the blog and in the Comments section over the past month or so; and to talk about what's supposed to happen next, while I'm away. Are you ready?
Michael Gove wants children to learn more facts. Why? Because we can benchmark more easily. He just kind of slipped that in to his interview on the Today programme where they were all very matey together (Gove used to work on the programme as a researcher).
Lisa Sellman, owner and professional dog trainer at Aloha Pet Care & Dog Training, volunteers for half a dozen charitable organizations. She believes that community service is its own reward, a message that resonates throughout her new children’s book The Legend of the Wolves of Gunflint Lake.
On May 26th, the Glitter Guild is having a show/auction to raise money to help them get to this year’s GenCon. Two acts from Gorilla Tango Burlesque will be there!
Trendy neons of today are much softer and feminine than that of the 16 Candles era. There are many choices of colors and hues to shop around for to fulfill any person’s neon craze. Avoid the tacky colors of the 80’s and focus on the grown-up, modern version of today.
Is just what life’s about.
And I climbed up...
For those to whom this will come as heresy, he asks (with a searing frankness which is one of the best comments on last autumn's newspaper/blog review debate):
Carefully break open a few Oreos and remove the icing with a knife. Replace it with a thin layer of white toothpaste and put the cookies back together. Leave them right at the opening of the package for the cookie monster who will be unable to resist their favorite sandwich cookie.
"I love you too, you hear me? I always have and I always will."
I'm still here, have been having a little bit of a break from scrapping.
Black suede belt -Target (years ago)
house, we had one last blowout. It was a great time, and after the show
Despite the existing disparities in defining the concept of social network/ing yet their wide agreement on the interdisciplinary nature of the filed, it emerged from social psychology, sociology, statistics, and other subjects just to mention but few. Jacob Moreno is a scholar highly credited with developing the first sociograms in the 1930s to study interpersonal relationships as structures in which people were points and the relationships between them were drawn as connecting lines. These approaches were mathematically formalized in the 1950s and theories and methods of social networks becoming wide spread in the social and behavioral sciences by the 1980s (Wasserm at el, 1994).
One of the most apparent side effects of social media is narcissism. Everything we post is all about us. Where we've been, what we're doing, what we're eating and where we're at. It seems that with this so much flexibility and liberty on a social networking site that we tend to forget - manners. We like to broadcast ourselves on just about everything.
I don't know if it's just American culture or just me or what, but once you have achieved the home and family thing, the societal models kind of peter out. So I assumed,like a doofus, that things must pretty much just peter out on the inter-familial stress front since there was apparently nothing left to report. I figured the kids moved out, you got wrinkly, you went to Vegas a lot, then had a hip replacement and eventually died.
All dressed for Christmas.
James L. Crawford, 33, Madison, N.J.
There are some items that are perpetually on that mental list and are automatic purchases when they show up for the right price. Scrabble letters fit this category because they are so handy for a variety of projects that include gift wrapping and table settings.
I changed her, she become upset. I didn't distract her with a toy, singing or anything else. I allowed her to become upset. I finished and placed her in the middle of the bed rather than scooping her up into my arms as usual, which always stops the upset.
Coming Next: Activity 1 - Growing Grass and Green Beans
But maybe Nehor nonetheless believed:
"And Now Your Even Older"
Another weekend has passed and not much packing has been accomplished…I hate to admit. But the past two days weren’t an entire loss: Nico and I squared away the recyclables and came up with a plan ‘B’ to carry us over here after our lease is up. It seems that the restoration of Peniki is going to take a bit longer than we’d anticipated; as for the cost, that too is climbing and climbing. Ugh! *cavewoman grunt*
Inkling, you ask? I had an inkling that you’d call me on this one. But then, I also had an inkling that you might have an inkling that there’s more to inkling than meets the eye.
So that's it for today. I don't want to overexert myself on my first day back here. Plus my writing has taken a nose dive so hopefully that will get better again over time! I'll leave you with a picture of the 3 of us plus a munchkin in the belly!!!
HERRING UNDER THE FUR – 14.00
Aquino made this statement while speaking to reporters during the 25th anniversary celebration of the Philippine Information Agency last February 1.
3) After receiving the PayPal link you will need to sign up for a WordPress.com account with THE SAME email you sent the original email from. This is extremely easy to do, will only take a few seconds, and you can do it here.
From my POV I need a glossary... and a BLT!
I could bore you to tears by telling you how much I adore couscous and its immense flexibility. I could also go into a dizzying amount of detail about the history and origin of these wonderful semolina grains. Or, I could save you (and me) the time by simply telling you that this salad tastes amazing and is absolutely worthy of your efforts! If you don't mind, I'll go with the latter.
Yet, I doubt that any of Chipotle's restaurants are taking down their "naturally raised" signs when they revert to using 5, 20, or 100% conventionally raised meats. Unfortunately, this term is all advertisingmuch like the factory-farmed eggs with a photo of a free-range paradise on the label. There is no "natural" or "humane" certification. So while Chipotle's Food With Integrity program asks for antibiotic and hormone-free, vegetarian fed, humanely handled meats, it's up to them to decide whether and how often to supply it to the consumer.
"My" little mouse was standing -- yes, standing, on his (or her) hind legs, looking remarkably anthropomorphic -- right behind the passenger side's rear tire.
Thanks so much to all my lovely followers and welcome to my newest ones, it's lovely to know you are out there reading and I'm not just rambling on with no one paying any attention to me :-)
Watch your words, for they become actions.
This is true. It’s not just the uniform. There’s also a certain uniformity to all the guys in our class. It couldn’t have always been like this, but as we get closer to starting our lives in the Administration, the males are beginning to look more the part.
Salina took Pak Samad to greater heights and his writing career flourished.
This is a graffiti on the wall of the American University of Cairo (AUC - my university) which overlooks Tahrir square and is on both Falki st and Mohammad Mahmoud st. It reads on the top "The Revolution
Today we went looking at ovens and cooktops and sinks, oh my!
Those two days were followed with a general "I don't feel so good" day with a light fever and then a 12 hour lift. Happy sigh. And then.....BAM! Four days of raging and delirious fever. I don't know about you, but I am too old for raging fevers. 103.7 is just too much. It messes with my head. It went something like this:
So far on Africam today, we have seen African (Cape) Buffalo, Hammerkop, Nyala, Elephant, Zebra, Wildebeest, Waterbuck, Impala, Baboons and Giraffe. Click here to see all of today’s pictures.
Finally, my thanks to those silly few of you who’ve chosen to “follow” Beer Rant. I’m planning to put together a post that acknowledges as many of you as I can, with links to your blogs or websites, but in the meantime, I appreciate your stopping in from time to time and I enjoy seeing your comments posted.
Finally I figured out a way to change that too, but now all the links to it stopped working...
Stampin Write Markers: Calypso Coral and Lucky Limeade (2011-2013 In color assortment(#123002)), Riding Hood Red (#120971), Blush Blossom (#100037), Old Olive (#100079), Sahara Sand (#105105, Daffodil Delight (#119677)
I think it is very important to teach my children to be thankful for everything. We talk about being grateful. I try to explain to them how very blessed they are. Since they are so small, still, one of the easiest things I do to reinforce thankfulness is to have them make thank you cards.
The cannibals, who had been drinking vodka, cut Mr Stepaniuk's body up before barbecuing the parts.
today- my sister.
All this going on when she selfishly chose to implant 6 more embryos. See links below for details.
The surprising fact is, I feel more powerful in general as a result of having and overcoming panic. If you haven’t suffered from panic, depression or deep grief (and there are few of us who avoid these throughout our lives!) – you may not have realised the incredible ability of your mind to take control, recover and eventually become even stronger. If you’re suffering from these experiences now, you can look forward to learning this for yourself. Yes, it’s hard to believe but, if you ask for help and take responsibility for your thoughts, one day you can look back on your struggle as a gift.
The Coulson resignation broke at precisely the wrong time for The Slog. Not only did I waste an hour watching Blair being gummed to death by Chilcot, I was also busy writing an exclusive on Gove’s inability to tame the mad folks at Ofsted – and therefore two hours behind the biggest political story for weeks. So I haven’t yet anywhere near finished trying sift through the many layers of merde involved in the complex case of Newscorp and its alleged privacy invasions.
Joseph Anthony Ianelli, 28, Hoboken, N.J.
So don't treat mistakes as something to avoid, my fellow marketing professionals! Treat them as a valuable income stream! I certainly do.
Yes, I know. New Scary Picture of self, but was rather fed up with the Summer Scene and gently wafting flowers in old picture, when am back in my furry boots and thermals, while thinking seriously about whether to get out the Furry Hat.
After The Historical Defeat Of The President’s Party, Mike Fuller, PhD Supports The French Socialist Party To Get The Government Leadership Now And Invites The French Senator David Assouline To Be The New Prime Minister Of The Country!
2. From Mentor to Mindguide "Both experts and upstarts claim to see unlimited potential in shared wisdom, Dr. Ellen Weber points out. "Yet seasoned mentors advise clever cronies to operate much like themselves, in spite of rapidly changing horizons."
Sector 7 begins with a boy on a school field trip to the Empire State Building. Out on the observation deck, with visibility very low, a feisty, rapscallion of a cloud steals the boy's hat and scarf, then takes him on an unforgettable tour. The cloud carries the boy up to Sector 7, a cloud factory in the sky. Here the boy gets himself into a bit of trouble. A group of clouds, bored with their mundane designs, coax the boy into sketching new blueprints for them. The clouds love his drawings; Quality Control does not. After being ejected from Sector 7, the boy returns to his class. But evidence of his adventure is all around him.
For dinner with friends, raid your workwear closet for a tailored blazer, roll the sleeves, and don it over jeans and a tee.
Last Thursday and Friday, we wrapped up our planting unit by reading The Tiny Seed by Eric Carle and making some art inspired by the book's illustrations.
“Well, everyone’s gotta eat shaving cream once in a while!”
My only quibble with this cookbook is its title. With just over 50 recipes and 160 pages, I would hardly refer to this cookbook as being encyclopedic. Sure, there are many variations suggested for each recipe, but it does not encompass the universe of cookie recipes. Still, aside from this overly ambitious title, I have really enjoyed poring over this stylish, fun new cookbook and it has earned a (floury) place in my cookbook library.
The old man hangs up his phone and turns to his wife. 'Okay,' he says, 'they're coming for Christmas and paying their own way.'
1 teaspoon of salt
To prove old England's overthrow;
Stairs
I am adopted by the various girls in the house; my Chandigarh friend’s daughter – aged 16, who is being trained in music by Mr. B – and her mother, Mr. B’s 19 year old niece, who is somewhat in awe of her famous uncle and hence can’t speak or eat in front of him, and the Iranian receptionist of the adventure park next door, which Mr. B also owns, and where the camels tend to spend their time. The girls show me the various animals that live at the farm; two horses, mum and baby; a herd of cows, who stare blankly at us; a group of guard dogs, an adopted jungle dog named Cutie (and she actually is!), the biggest Great Dane I’ve ever seen, and two terrifying Rottweilers, both of whom continue to scare me for the next week. We pass the studio where Mr. B practices and records some of his tracks, and stop at the swing seat where I’m introduced to tinny Blackberry recordings of Mr. B’s songs – and various imitations of how he walks. Not yet knowing the man’s gait, I have to pretend to find them funny, but I think the girls appreciate it.
When you watch a DV court case…there is purple everywhere.
Intriguingly, many of the songs on Volta feature Björk talking about politics for the first time in her long career. On the militant sounding ‘Declare Independence’ she sings: ‘Start your own currency/Make your own stamp/Protect your language/Declare independence . . . raise your flag.’
As for everyone else, what do you think? I really like that it looks unique, but do you think anyone else will (ie. future owners of my home)? Does it look more like the front of a house now?
… for we walk by faith, not by sight. 2 Corinthians 5:7
In principal, said Dr. Leatherman, ”I’d say, let ‘em take their licks.”
Can I start by saying that I fully accept that it is everybody’s God given right to dawdle if they choose. Whether it be through old age, infirmity or inclination that they see fit to walk at a snail’s pace, so be it. But can I just say, on behalf of the rest of us, if you do choose to dawdle, can you please for the love of God get out of the bloody way?
This Oscar-acclaimed film has all the attributes of a classic, the romance, fame and glamour tied together to create a masterpiece of rarely seen quality. The story line flows wonderfully, encapsulating the highs and lows of a professional actor’s short-lived time in the spotlight.
Their first line of popular pocket watches was called the Broadway Limited. It was marketed as the "Watch of Railroad Accuracy," and it actually was used by railroad workers. Because conductors had to keep a tight schedule, they all carried pocket watches. Hamilton became the brand of choice for American railroad workers. But the times they were a changin.'
Rewarded for launching 50 yellow fireworks = 1 Anniversary Token.
Elizabeth: The least favourite thing about ones writing life is that you have to go out and promote the book once it is done. I wish I could leave that to someone else. The most favourite aspect of writing is how the ideas come to you and how you weave them into the tapestry that ends up being the final product.
Tars fed power to the ramscoop and Loup-garou eased out of polar orbit, perpendicular to the ecliptic. They slipped the surly bonds of their natal star and climbed toward the high untrespassed sanctity of interstellar space, perhaps to touch the face of God. When all preparations were complete, all calculations made, and a few quiet prayers offered up, Tars took a deep breath and gave the order to engage the irrational engine.
11/20 Portland, OR Hawthorne Theatre
So what do we take away from this? Well, despite the fact that we have more channels, we still see a lot of the same local guys involved in running the stations. But countering that, we see a sudden need for content. Cheap content. So we are seeing small, new, national groups that may turn into the next Nick (remember when they used to run old Dick Van Dyke shows?). So old repeats of "Too Close for Comfort" and "Peter Gunn" have returned.
Maxtible and Waterfield finally have a falling out as Waterfield discovers Maxtible’s true motives. Waterfield now falls firmly into The Doctor’s camp. Maxtible, however, is on his own. His greed allowed The Daleks to manipulate him, and now he is totally at their mercy. They haven’t broken his will, but he is now at a disadvantage. Maxtible is so far down the road of greed and deceit that he is compelled to keep moving in the same direction, despite now knowing he has lost everything. The Daleks have destroyed his home and he is trapped on Skaro.
we spent some time outside this morning, raking and hauling more leaves, blowing bubbles, chalking the driveway, checking out the blooms and hanging out in the fairy hut.
When I first saw the idea online of baking your own hamburger buns, I was a little bit skeptical that it would actually be worth it. But after whipping up a bunch of these puppies during naptime and baking them at dinner time, I'm totally convinced. These hamburger buns put the grocery store buns we normally eat to shame. And they really weren't hard.
The secret is Helping Each Other Reach The Top.
Snow is coming and I'm slightly going into over protective parent mode with my plants!!
Life is the harmattan breeze
8:00pm - 11:30pm
pumping, pumping tiny legs,
Why can’t I just watch? But I can’t just watch.
Get all the info you can on the display.
I was amused, and repeated it to Kirby as I drove him to work. Kirby said "OH, Joe--Nobody even invited him! He just showed up. He's ALWAYS bored."
29/01/2010(AFP)–Phnom Penh – A human rights group accused Cambodian Prime Minister Hun Sen on Friday of trying to reverse political pluralism after the nation’s main opposition leader was sentenced to jail this week.
The grilled polenta was arranged in thick triangles around the edge of the dish, giving it some height and made me think of slices of toasty. Along the centre of the dish was a mound of sautéed diced portabella mushrooms, artichoke hearts, broccolini in a sun dried tomato, cashew-cream marsala sauce, which was then sprinkled with fresh basil.
There is two things that can be measured, decide which is measured then compared the best matches to see where it fits in on the excel chart.
My goal was to lighten the room
Next up: 1991 Topps. That will be a fun one, too.
… even if it’s one that no one is really searching.
Feel free to use it as you see fit, within reason of course. Hopefully at some point I'll turn up all literature I produced to go with it and upload that but in the meantime perhaps someone will find it useful as is.
The mother of two was gobsmacked. She started explaining to me how she had so much to do during the week and how exhausted she was between work and taking care of the house, husband and boy. How all these things meant she didn't really have a chance to do these things with her boy. I had to tell her to stop making excuses because they weren't necessary! I told her that I have time to play games and research activities to do with my daughter because I work less then half the hours she does and I have two gorgeous cleaning ladies!
I swear to God I am going to track down that vendor and strangle him with one of his own products.
april.5: i went to an open mic called Artichoke Haircut and i
I stop for tea.
In essence, thesaurus rape reads like an inmate who turns Muslim in prison and try to talks philosophical, yet in complete ignorance of what he's saying. (For those who need more clarity, watch Booked on Phonics )
Instead, I thought, "I will find a treat to buy myself for being a good shopper. Just one."
So what to share today?
These statistics are disturbing, but for many women, is it really a case of 'fearing the fear'?
As year 19 loomed, I got a hair-brained idea. “Why wait until year 20?” I asked John. We had three teens and for the first time a little money in our savings. “Nineteen is a huge celebration, too. Our kids are old enough that we can leave them and know the house won’t burn down. We have friends who can check in to make sure they’re eating and not killing each other.” John loved the idea, and so we sailed away.
Automatic face detection consists of three parts:
It's still November and I am officially sick of Christamas. Too much anticipation, too much pressure to buy fantastic gifts, and far too much need to comprise a list of 'proper presents' for family to buy from. Yes, I have THAT kind of Christmas. A Christmas that, despite being most definitely an adult, I must draw up a list of reasonably priced items for others to buy me.
5 reach
it's light again
And stopped hiding
"In accordance with the greatest traditions of the Freedom Loving People's Democratic Working Republic of North Korea, you will report to your next duty station: Camp Kwan-li-so No.22 Haengyong. Uniform: striped pajamas."
His reason for wearing a girl’s dress was to protest against the overly-male judiciary. Yet there are surely valid legal arguments against female judges. Bear in mind that most criminals are young men, and the worst rogues among them are often blessed with the looks of Ray Liotta in Goodfellas. What is to stop them from flirting with a female judge by mentally undressing her in court and making passionate eye-contact whenever she addresses him? Most lady judges would be of an age when that kind of attention from a younger man is hugely flattering. Would a woman subjected to such fervent ogling really be capable of putting her romantic fantasies to one side when sentencing the fellow? This is much less of a problem for male judges, as very few villains would make lustful eyes at an old buffer in a wig, even in the hope of a lighter sentence.
In the end, a value-add solution for a product must be one which is both logical and credible to the customer as well as to you. Trust in marketing is based on a promise delivered with exemplary performance. So, in creating a value-add solution you need to develop an enhanced product which to the customer is worth the money and which to you is worth the strategic effort (investment, higher profits, greater segment profitability).
Sunday afternoons are my favorite time to plan as I like to grocery shop on Monday's. I buy a lot of bulk, and purchase a quarter of a steer and chickens from a local farm so my grocery list is usually a lot of fresh produce and dairy items. I shop mainly at three stores: Costco, Back to the Best (a little country farm store in our area) and Whole Foods. Costco is my bulk store and is a monthly trip that the whole family likes to enjoy. Back to the Best is where we get fresh milk, cheese and eggs and it is an every two week stop. Whole Foods is my weekly stop and I am working at getting it down to every two weeks to shop - that means more planning.
Because I wonder who I was, for him, in the midst of some of those terrible days. Was that the day that I sent an e-mail, nagging him for not calling me in 3 weeks?
The top image is a view over the city of Firenze, or Florence, in Italy. It has no direct relevance, except that it’s a place where we want to spend more time on a regular basis.
The classic Cole Porter hooker ballad "Love For Sale."
Women, it is time we stopped viewing governance as a game for big, strong men and started viewing it as the church Ways and Means Committee. We know how to get things done for the benefit of our people. Let’s do it. Assume the authority and run for office. Women support women.
“The University has planned to begin rotating advanced pharmacy students to perform clinical rotations in area retail pharmacies, hospitals and health clinics as early as this summer,” Ammons said in his email.
What will follow.
She gets around OK on three legs, but now she has back problems and she’s deaf.
The reason hunters are notorious for cutting fences and leaving gates open is because it happens. A lot. And even if hunters are courteous about closing gates – and there are those who do – hunting puts elk on the run. Elk have a tendency to make their own gates when confronted with a fence.
Thoughts like that impact my little life.
Catchy name for an insulation company.
22 It was the feast of the Dedication at Jerusalem; 23 it was winter, and Jesus was walking in the temple, in the portico of Solomon. 24 So the Jews gathered round him and said to him, “How long will you keep us in suspense? If you are the Christ, tell us plainly.” 25 Jesus answered them, “I told you, and you do not believe. The works that I do in my Father’s name, they bear witness to me; 26 but you do not believe, because you do not belong to my sheep. 27 My sheep hear my voice, and I know them, and they follow me; 28 and I give them eternal life, and they shall never perish, and no one shall snatch them out of my hand. 29 My Father, who has given them to me, is greater than all, and no one is able to snatch them out of the Father’s hand. 30 I and the Father are one.”
By the way, did I mention that I only used natural fertilisers? I love making my earth happy. A happy earth means happy plants, naturally.
Good Luck & Enjoy the Challenge!
One of those places is the Hoffman Mansion, outside of Peoria, OK. We stumbled upon it while looking for a nearby geocache called… (drum roll)… the Hoffman Mansion.
Once I left school, we fell back into a more familiar rhythm. We spent our days playing, creating art, and going to various group activities. When Emi reached school-age, there was never any suggestions of her going to school.
Hopefully I will soon have some new art to put up on here :)
